Look again...
Don't take my question too personal, please. Why didn't you know that? I've learned stuff like that in school...
Thanks. Turkish. Actually I chalk it up mostly to my early exposure to X-COM series :)
I figured it was probably posted before, but I had never seen it on here.
I have experience in writing algorithms that search for HR buzzwords.
Also, if it hits objects like an MCOM or a wall/ceiling it isn't nearly as effective. Best bet is the floor/ground to ge the best dispersal. 
It's not new anymore, but I love this video! \m/
You mean make a beard grow on the other guy? Makes sense. Coz Chrisitians don't deserve beards. They don't even deserve touching them.
Well, he was the winner of the [ultimate showdown](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4WgT9gy4zQA).
Perhaps they're less forced, but many Go Daddy commercials and other commercials on tech shows that are on Revision 3 aren't that bad.  They display a product, they tell me its advantages, and there's no fallacious BS to cover the ad.  I love seeing those ads.
Sometimes you'll have to break your neck to keep your chin up. The most important thing is to find that something to keep it up. Do you have a passion in something? Whatever it is, just continue doing that. 
They still have an established church that their taxes pay for though
I just joined reddit today after awhile of lurking to wish you the best man. Until now I've spent my expendable time of the day on digg but the community there is nothing like this.
Yeah, they got the general idea right, but some details wrong.  Like the earliest cities, which were MUCH [earlier than 4500 years ago](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jericho).  And it's kind of funny that they have "first pharoah" and then "divine kingship" like 1000 years later.  But the broad strokes (and most of the details) are right.
Shaved ice is better than crushed ice, if you're making snow cones.  If you're putting ice in your drink, don't put in shaved ice.  It would melt instantly, and be like pouring cold water into your drink.
Then why on earth do you feel you will get caught then?  Valve isn't Apple.  Of course you could just be a trolling...
She actually had breast reduction surgery.  If you look at (NSFW!) [this still](http://imgur.com/gtoNL.jpg) from Black Snake Moan, and compare the tattoo with (NSFW!) [this pic](http://imgur.com/CH4Y0.jpg) you can see the same tattoo and the quite obvious scars running vertically down from her nipples.  Common scarring from reduction surgery.
True. Still. Those teeth. Thinking about it, I can't but think that was a Photoshop job they pulled on him. There isn't a man alive with teeth that white. And if there is, well, then I would check my rectum just to be sure.
Hey Fox, in a day and age where children are exposed to mass marketing that wants them to look and act a certain way, I think there should be atleast one person telling them, *"You're perfect just the way you are"*
How did you find the gigs?
The boundary of clouds is fractal.  It never ends or begins.
Cosby is and will always be a known for his sweaters. Of great, bold and vibrant sweaters, ablaze with color and a style all of his own. Take the opportunity to ask him about sweaters.  Ask him about the sweater he is wearing.  Ask him which is his favourite Cosby Sweater.  Ask him how he thinks contemporary sweaters compare to sweaters from the 1980s.  Show him four photos, each of a sweater from the 70s, 80s, 90s, and 00s. See if he can identify which sweater comes from each era. (I bet he will get all four right).  Ask him for his thoughts on the sweaters in the pictures.  Lead in to asking him about sweaters generally. Where does he stand on sweaters today?  What does he believe are the important and defining moments in sweater history?  How does he feel that he fits into that history?   If he's modest - big him up a bit and discuss his influence in the worlds of sweaters and fashion.  Where does he see sweaters going in the future.  HERE COMES THE MONEY QUESTION: Stay cool when you deploy this one. Remember we'll all be rooting for you. And we'll all be counting on you.  Ask Bill Cosby: what is the future of the Cosby Sweater?  What kinds of sweaters will we be seeing him wearing over the next five, ten, twenty years?  Turn up the heat a bit and push for those details.  Then you can turn the heat down some and make a relaxing segue into this next question:  Ask him to reminisce and tell a funny story about a sweater (remember he was also a comedian once).  Was that story he just told about a Cosby Sweater?   Yes - does he still posses the said sweater? Where is it now? Has anything else funny happened to it?   No - hahaha thanks Bill, that was a funny story. Tell me another but this time about a Cosby Sweater?  Other than championing sweaters, what else does he feel has been an important achievement in his life?  Did these other activities involve sweaters? In what capacities?  After you have pissed him off with sweater questions give him a tough time over cancelling House of Cosbys.  But sweater questions first.
YOUNG man
Nick Pegg is so Badass, he killed Chuck Norris in 2008 and Chuck Norris hasn't even noticed yet.
Nearly freezing to death is my usual solution.
puppy bacon?
None :(
Seconded. Frankly, anyone who describes themselves as a libertarian isn't going to fit in, at least politically, anywhere in the country, but yes, Alberta will be the closest.  We all like our socialism. Alberta is just slightly more "meh" about it.
well played Maverick, well played
This is really one of the best written shows in the history of television. It looks simple after a single episode but watch two or three and you will see a plot develop. Seriously one of the funniest shows on TV. Best show to watch when drunk as well. 
Or it just goes to Colombia Pictures. I'm pretty sure most of the people involved in the film are dead. I don't think it matters how people see it as long as they see it.
Well, I know I have to solve it, but that's the part my brain seems to take issue with. I mean, how do you know x=7.5?
 'If (2x-5)(2x+5)=5, what is the value of 4x^2'  Solve for X in the first equation, plug that X value into the 2nd. I don't scratch paper or I would solve this for you. What specifically about functions confuses you?
&gt; This video contains content from EMI, who has blocked it in your country on copyright grounds.  Germany.
I want to second the recommendation to check out the Auraria campus. There are several schools there, so you can shop around to find the cheapest classes...and they're often taught by the same people.  Also, OP, go check out [Rainbow Alley at The Center](http://www.glbtcolorado.org/RainbowAlleyPrograms_ProgramsGroups.aspx). They're going to have some of the best information about resources in the area, and they might be able to help you find housing (or at least point you in the right direction).  I get a strong feeling from your post that you're in the Springs--if you are, I'm very sorry. Get out of there as fast as you can! Heck, I'll drive down and pick you up if you need it.  Good luck!
/agree. if he's a witness to his shit getting basically broken into, why doesn't he say anything?  Think about it another way. If OP had witnessed a coworker eating his lunch out of the break room (or wherever) what would you do? Set a trap?  No, you'd probably put a passive aggressive note on the bag about how someone is stealing your stuff. If you witness it however, say "hey, don't do that ..... you cunt faced prick."
It's funny watching reasonably intelligent men discuss a totally juvenile popcorn muncher as if it were some important piece of cinema. I don't get it.
These are the kind of questions that keep me up at night. 
Someone needs to rebuild this in photoshop or w/e and make a few customs for the people at reddit :)
Looks like your old friend is a fucking retard who's into self mutilation. 
You're super cute btw. I strongly suggest lush brand of henna products http://www.lush.ca/shop/products/haircare/henna-hair-dyes/ they're take awhile to do, but the results are fab.
As your attorney, I advise you to file a restraining order.
WTF is a summer school?
You're saying finance is an exact science?
I did that once. Got raw sea slug.  Slimy on the outside and impossible to chew on the inside.  Now I ask!
try r/conspiracytheory
That looks like Sweet Dee from It's Always Sunny.
I could honestly do McDonalds if they weren't fucking-everywhere. 
I don't pray to Jesus, I pray to God. There's a huge difference. I get a huge response from God.
Brilliant advice.. it's funny how it seems so many aspects of relationships revolve around confidence... being able to attract and keep someone happy seems to require a lot of self belief.
Flashblock + Noscript. Although they're both habits from my windows days. I could probably get away with not using them now on Linux. 
where is this world going?
In contrast to "Mountin' goatse".
Why the hell does the US like and listen to self-justified philistines over real politicians, I suppose.  But I know the answer.  We do love our demagogues.
Wow, there's a lot of people with interesting (incorrect) statements in this thread.  If the C compiler is removing a loop because it can prove that the loop will terminate and produce no visible state changes (side-effects) then that is a valid optimization.  That's not what's happening here. In this case, some C compilers removed a loop that they were unsure about. Turns out the loop never terminates, and if a C compiler removes a non-terminating loop from a program, that C compiler is broken.  Reference C99 sections 5.1.2.3 paragraph 3, 6.8 paragraph 2, and 6.8.5 paragraph 4.  Edit:  For all who don't think this is correct - check the article again. Some of the broken compilers are fixing the bugs that this article uncovered. Any compiler that removes an infinite loop is *broken*.
There's a reason few people start saving in their 20's. Hey, it would be great, but I've at least got to pay off my loan before I can start worrying about retirement savings.
Okay, I'm all for freedom but this wasn't it. They were using their monopolistic stronghold on the market and making their own "standards" that no one else could possibly follow. If they had been allowed to continue on their course we'd all have to have several browsers because the ones made and tested only for IE would work only with IE. Where's the freedom for non windows people then?
Have an upvote anyway. I lol'ed.
that's a yes.
Just because people are writing software using Mono doesn't mean that I have to like it :)  As far as I can tell there are 4 major projects that use Mono.  Banshee, Tomboy, Silverlight, and F-Spot.  None of which I use, so I think I'll be okay.
You might find this http://rstb.royalsocietypublishing.org/content/365/1537/133.full interesting it's an overview of evolutionary convergence - the appearance in diverse species of the same structures and the reappearance at diverse times of same, also the convergence of separated clones in differing environments.  One example is sonar in bats and dolphins; http://www.newscientist.com/article/dn18428-bats-and-dolphins-separately-evolved-same-sonar-gene.html.  There appear to be predetermined end points.
You tha dopest mafa in this park, knowmasayin?
I've always had it stewed.  Also, when you cut it up -- be careful, the bones splinter pretty easily. 
It's not going to make a lick of goddamn sense.  But I've wanted to read this for years. So, **fuck yes.**
She is providing fill light for that African American man taking pictures. With better lighting, the photos are more easily enhanced. 
Map awareness is key.  Call mias during laning phase but don't rely on them from teammates.  Learn to watch the minimap to be aware of enemy positions.  If too many are missing get to a tower asap.  Try your best to keep your front tower early game.  Without it it's much harder to control the river mid and late game. If there's a warwick or another jungler on the other team try to catch them in the jungle.  Wards are helpful for this, especially by the dragon.   If you start off poorly play defensively! Just farm gold and exp so you can be useful later in the team fights. Do not keep playing aggressively or your team will lose.  For most champions Teleport is very good on this map.  It lets you get your important items sooner, and you don't have to worry as much about staying in lane with 1/3 health or no mana.  It also makes it easier to recover from a bad start.  If a team fight breaks out across the map you can be there. 
This is one of those things I wouldn't believe without a picture. 
well, sometimes, i dont know, maybe, yes, i guess, not right now though, i dont think, no, yea, probably later
I worked in Dutch Harbor for a stint. I was down in the hold of the boat running some tests and the rest of the crew had just arrived. This God awful loud helicopter beating starts hammering above deck and all I can think is "oh crap, we're being raided - someone on the crew is bad news" I get above deck and it's just Discovery Channel shooting shots of the harbor from a chopper. The Wizard and the Northwestern actually spent a whole day steaming out of Dutch and back so the helicopter could get shots of them sailing around. The chopper then spent a good two days buzzing the harbor and the surrounding mountainside.   I got lucky and flew out of Dutch and spent some time with some of the Discovery Channel AV crew - got to give them some grief about their helicopter nearly giving me a heart attack.
Sorry, cord cancer is inoperable. 
&gt;public transportation  Ummm...did you forget where you are?
DO NOT GO TO CHINA... go to the republic of china.. that is.. TAIWAN!  and teach english.  You will save thousands of dollars a month.  You will find a nice 2 bedroom in a great city with a gym for &lt; $350/month and you will earn good money teaching english.  I hear this is a good option in Korea also.
Did the person putting this list together not realize that the Project Natal video was hacked together from separate clips? I guess this is what happens when all of your research comes from typing "tech demo fail" into youtube.
Then what happened?
I think you are making sense, but my criticism of Harris arrives before we get that far in our thought process.  In fact, I find a problem in the very second sentence of his fact sheet (what really are a set of premises, I think, just not formally written as such).  &gt;There are behaviors, intentions, cultural practices, etc. which potentially lead to the worst possible misery for everyone. There are also behaviors, intentions, cultural practices, etc. which do not  This is actually incorrect and I think he already knows this.  That second sentence is not a full sentence, I chopped it in half, but it appears to be sneaking something in.  I'll assume you agree with the first sentence, I do as well.  The problem is that on a casual reading the second sentence appears to mirror the first, when in fact it does not.  Notice that the word "potentially" is removed from the second sentence.  While I would agree with the statement, "there are behaviors, intentions, cultural practices, etc. which potentially do not lead to the worst possible misery for everyone," I cannot agree with the statement, "there are behaviors, intentions, cultural practices which do not lead to the worst possible misery for everyone."  I can't agree with this not because I know it isn't true, but because I don't know whether or not it is true, even in principle.  Is there a set of behaviors, intentions and cultural practices that will *never* in any context lead to misery for everyone?  Do all actions have an inevitable set of consequences in a deterministic universe, or is it possible that the same action repeated in the same circumstance will sometimes have a different outcome, and thus spawn a different chain of events?  If we admit that actions as a whole are not, in fact, split cleanly down the middle as potentially either leading to misery for everyone or not, don't we have to further admit that any given action which could potentially lead to misery for everyone may also not lead to misery?  In other words, that we don't really know the question we are asking from the beginning, we don't have two groups of distinctly divided actions from which to test our empirical hypotheses.  Then we come to the rest of the sentence, the part that I think most trained philosophy students would pounce on first.  &gt;and which, in fact, lead to states of wellbeing for many sentient creatures, to the degree that wellbeing is possible in this universe.  What is well-being?  This might seem silly or academic, perhaps he is asserting well-being as a simple overall "good" state for individuals or society, but obviously as a utilitarian well-being is absolutely central to Harris, we need to know exactly what this constitutes.  If it is "good" states, then we beg the question of what is good, and whether it applies universally.  Without knowing exactly what it is, we can't know if it is even possible to maximize or minimize well-being for people who may have disparate values.  Is it happiness?  For most utilitarians it is, but Harris seems to avoid this in order to avoid the classical responses.  Perhaps happiness is one of the values secondary to overall well-being?  For example, he seems to make clear that "liberty" is a secondary value to well-being.  Is this correct?  What if there existed someone who was given all the conditions to satisfy their well-being *except* for liberty and offered a choice between this life and one in which they have liberty but have good reason to believe the other secondary conditions will not be fulfilled.  Isn't it possible that some people (very few, I would guess, but some) would chose liberty over and ahead of all other measures of well-being?  If so, doesn't this indicate that for those people, the fundamental value they are attempting to maximize or minimize is not "well-being" at all, but "liberty"?  Sure, we could say that they are arriving at a relative well-being through liberty, but then we are admitting at the outset that well-being is relative.  That is to say, to maximize the well-being of those who fundamentally value liberty most we cannot maximize the well-being of those who do not simultaneously, there must be some compromise for one or both parties along the way.  And this doesn't even get into those for whom maximization of liberty constitutes distinctly different methodologies (i.e. even amongst those who seek to maximize liberty instead of other well-being attributes there will be reasonable disagreement).  Anyway, all of this is fun (for me anyway!) and I think there is much more that can be said in response to the fact sheet, but this begins to depart from the point I was originally making before Harris showed up.  I think I found a blogger who puts it a  better than I did, and it response to Harris himself.  Here are a few passages, but you might want to read the whole thing as it includes links to Harris and others who have responded to him:  &gt;First, the role of consensus. In formal reasoning, we all recognize the difference between axioms and deductions. We start by assuming some axioms, and the laws of logic allow us to draw certain conclusions from them. It’s not helpful to argue that the axioms are “wrong” — all we are saying is that if these assumptions hold, then  we can safely draw certain conclusions....  &gt;When it comes to morality, we indeed have a very similar situation. If  we all agree on a set of starting moral assumptions, then we constitute a functioning community that can set about figuring out how to pass moral judgments. And, as I emphasized in the original post, the methods and results of science can be extremely helpful in that project, which is the important and interesting thing that we all agree on, which is why it’s a shame to muddy the waters by denying the fact/value distinction or stooping to insults. But I digress....  &gt;The problem, obviously, is that we don’t all agree on the assumptions, as far as morality is concerned. Saying that everyone, or at least all right-thinking people, really want to increase human well-being seems pretty reasonable, but when you take the real world seriously it falls to pieces. And to see that, we don’t have to contrast the values of fine upstanding bourgeois Americans with those of Hitler or Jeffrey Dahmer. There are plenty of fine upstanding people — you can easily find them on the internet! — who think that human well-being is maximized by an absolute respect for individual autonomy, where people have equal access to primary goods but are given the chance to succeed or fail in life on their own. Other people think that a more collective approach is called for, and it is appropriate for some people to cede part of their personal autonomy — for example, by paying higher taxes — in the name of the greater good....  &gt;Now, we might choose to marshall arguments in favor of one or another of these viewpoints. But those arguments would not reduce to simple facts about the world that we could in principle point to; they would be appeals to the underlying moral sentiments of the individuals, which may very well end up being radically incompatible.  This is essentially my original point, do you think Harris challenges this successfully?
&gt; You're being obtuse.  The assumption was around 90% of the victims are male, yes?  Only after you asserted that.  Which was well after I objected to your original only-a-citation comment.  &gt; Where along this chain, exactly, do I exhibit poor reading comprehension? **Where, exactly.** Demonstrate it, or cease this nonsense.  Well, to give one explicit example, we have the following which you clearly failed to acknowledge as having existed whatsoever:  &gt; &gt;` `No, I didn't cite a study that 75% of the victims were male. I cited a study that 25% OF THE VICTIMS WERE FEMALE  &gt; ... The two statements are subsets of one another.  And here's another:  &gt; No, **you** are talking about priests, a narrowing of the subject that you have just now arbitrarily stated.  You might want to take a gander at the headline of the article.  It reads something like this:  &gt; Catholic school fires teacher after finding out she's gay. I guess it's only ok if you're a Priest.  ---------------------------  This is the part where you apologize for being a fucking dumbass and/or a troll.
Eat their eyes out of their skulls so they can't see each other anymore. Literally. 
This.  There will be lots of these, and other people will be better at them than you unless you prepare.   They won't ask crazy detailed questions about the mythology.
so does yours :) 
4.75% is pretty low. There may well be other things you can put your money into that have a higher ROI. For example, you're paying US$300 a year to go to the gym. If you're going to the gym for access to the equipment, and you could buy equipment that would substitute for the gym for US$1000 (and that would fit in your house!) you'd be making 30% on that money. Tax-free! That's a much better way to spend your money than paying off a 4.75% loan.  Now, maybe if you bought the equipment you wouldn't really use it; it's a bit of a gamble. If you buy it off Craigslist, you can at least sell it for the same price if you don't use it.  4.75% risk-free, tax-free ROI isn't a *bad* deal; it's a lot better than anything you can get in the stock market. But there may be a lot of things in your day-to-day life with a better ROI than that. Here are some ideas:  * If you bought a bicycle, maybe you could save both gym costs and train fare, and augment your mobility to boot. Myself, I always prefer the US$50 garage-sale specials, but my friends who are into biking tell me that a really nice bike (&gt;US$1000) can make the difference between hating biking and loving it. If you try to go that route, you should definitely talk to bicycling friends to get advice on what bike to get. [Edit: oops, I see you say you already bike a lot. So that's a way you could possibly be more frugal without even spending any money.] * If you invited your friends over to your apartment more, you could spend less money on eating out (which I'm guessing is most of that "incidental" US$1050 per month). Are there things you could buy that would make that more feasible? A couch, a foof chair, better cooking utensils, a crock pot, a deep freeze, a bread maker? * Are you interested in sewing? A sewing machine makes certain kinds of sewing much, much easier.  Being debt-free is a good thing, but it's not that great of a thing.
I loved [Paranoia Agent](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Paranoia\_Agent). Sometimes I feel like doing a marathon of that, FLCL, and Neon Genesis Evangelion just to see if I'll have an aneurysm.  This stuff about offing small children is just terrible, though. 
DAMN DAMN DAMN, you're hot!!!
First time I've ever seen anyone make a toast with tea.
I'm torn at which has made my day more...   The Christina Ricci photo?   Or Electron Boy?
*sniff* don't mind if i do
my wl-520gu has not turned out to be stable in the long run using DD-WRT, in my case at least.  Every other month or so it freezes up then resets itself to the default open and unsecured config  I'll try Tomato to see if it works better, but I would not want to deal with that frustration at a business
wait, what?
[](//#newjerkscantdothis "Enjoy CJ while you still have it, YOU HAVE BEEN NINJABANNED!")   Gosh darn it   I want it upside down :(   [](//#newjerkscantdothis "Enjoy CJ while you still have it, YOU HAVE BEEN NINJABANNED!")
okay cool... The way I read the title it seemed like you were trying to say "women in Maine are stupid because they are trying to get a legal right that they already have"... I think the whole point of this is awareness...
It's more like "bars", but I guess it depends where you live.
Almost 10 million visitors, not bad.
Vancouver Island.  Google it.
I just started [NS]  (noob-smackers).  It's a group of guys that play together every-so-often.  There's roughly six of us, but now it seems that just two or three play regularly.  If you're interested in joining, just shoot me a message.  To play with us, you have to be a team player... that means spotting, dropping packs and not being an asshole or camper. We're a nice group of guys and we have lots of fun.
Cute + sense of humour/lightheartedness. It's an attractive combination.   Quit grumbling and enjoy the cute pic. 
Then you failed, um...Hawking? "If you are complaining about the deficit AND about high taxes, you are a hypocrite who should be dismissed." It can be reasonable to complain about both deficit and high taxes if there is excessive spending.  That doesn't make one a hypocrite.  You approach the topic later, but that sentence is just plain dumb, Steve.
Don't skip alternating fingers when playing fingerstyle.  Sometimes I wish I started with 3 fingers instead of two since now I want to learn it but I always gallop if I go too fast.     Learn to use the direct touch of your hand to influence the feel of the note - like really "feel" out the string and how hard to pluck, the attack etc - you'll get it.      Playing with a pick is 100% fine no matter what any bassist tells you, but the sound you are gonna get with a pick (even felt or rubber) is not the same as your fingerpads so use them accordingly when that particular style/sound is needed.  
I have been in love with her since the Adams Family. 
Yes! I saw him open for Pearl Jam at a concert in Berkley back in the mid 90's. He was hypnotic.
[you are right](http://www.markshuttleworth.com/archives/359), it is only for the netbook version.  &gt;"We’re going to put the menu in the panel on the netbook edition of Ubuntu, and not on the desktop edition, because that’s where the screen real-estate is most precious. There are outstanding questions about the usability of a panel-hosted menu on much larger screens, where the window and the menu could be very far apart. Those questions are greatly diminished in the netbook environment, by definition.  &gt;Also, the netbook edition has a reduced application load. That will reduce the number of applications we need to get this working on." - Mark shuttleworth
Actually, I've seen many white and black janitors. I've also seen black people and white people working the fields in Arizona. To assume that only one ethnic group works hard and does things nobody else wants to do is pretty ignorant.
It was - "Down &amp; Out In Beverly Hills."
"My wife's boyfriend"  eh?
Well, it's not like I was making *that* big of a point, however, I do like to make it sting a little bit. More of an attention grabber really, and I just don't care about how silly it may make me look. ^_^
:( I completely missed that part. ...That's a problem.
**oops, forgot to add this into the original text:**  I've heard people tell me that "pause" sounds pompous. Other people think it's flat out incorrect for American English.  Be sure to say where you're from too!
Yeah, he's the only guy who's ever made that song awesome enough to listen to, (I'm not a big George guy despite being a Beatle nut) it's an awesome video.  I usually just use the standard G-C-E-A tuning, I'll tune it down to F#-B-D#-G# on occasion to make it easier on my voice as well. I'm not big on alternate tunings, don't know why.
Does it make me a bad person that I would like to see said superfirehurricane of epic proportion?
You got it dude!
In other news, alcohol lowers the libido. WTF, it works the opposite way for me. 
I had one that blew me while I played Dynamis in Final Fantasy XI... mmm...
I bought it because I'm a dumbass at the drive-thru and I *always* spill it and it's a nightmare. I actually wake up in the middle of the night hoping the next Big Mac and medium Coke don't betray me.
Prozac makes you naked?
[The overview](http://stealmylife.com/posts/bozarking-i-hope-its-a-troll-nsfw/)  but for the one that really made him big   [follow the yellow brick road](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/afr4p/shyness/c0hcq83)
Because Jobs stole over 4,000 dollars from Woz by lying to him about a contract.  He never paid it back.  Now he wants someone else to be punished for taking something worth about 200.00 in 1975 USD.
What is it you are trying to imply?  
&gt;Never tell about an afffair. It accomplishes nothing.  STDs. Trust.
Not so fast.   *Wild Abra Fled*
You can't go back in time more than a few minutes from the present so eventually the countering has to end. It costs more resources the further back in time you do stuff as well.
You're a handsome fella. 
Pillowcases? I could make pillowcases.
You're only quoting procedure and not addressing the *why*.
No bother dude, my father in law to be is a Cisco consultant, i know how picky networking can be,spent 2 hours last night configuring a router to act as a wireless gateway so my GF(fiance?) could use her DS online without having to redo my entire network, hope you solve your speed issue, send me a shout if you need any more help
Nay, tis an excellent pun. 
Its weird and a little derranged but the art is pretty good and deff entertaining.
You're missing out man, Chinese people are tasty as fuck (if you into game that is).
&gt;&gt;Considering you factored race as part your username, I'm not waiting on a response of high caliber from you, just to let you know.  That's because you are an idiot.
Wasn't this guy in Street Fighter?
Agreed, dirt is too much room for random.
&gt; Our local library has a fitness center with a pool, showers, arcade and some other goodies (basketball, raquetball, etc) and it's something like $6 for non members to get in. Probably  I also live in Virginia and this is relevant to my interests. Where exactly is this place?
^_^
Dave's ESL Cafe is a good source of info, but please don't let it shape your perception of the industry. Before I left for Korea I was really nervous because I had been reading that site and had heard many horror stories. Then when I got here I never checked the site again. I quickly realized the majority of people who posted on that site were miserable because they didn't know how else to handle their situation.   If you are really interested, send me a PM about your situation (including your education which is the most important prerequisite to teaching in Korea - you must have at least a 4 year bachelor's from a University/College). I'll get back to you with some more info.
They suck at parallel parking too.
Try telling that to the poor bastards who are still looking for the ark. While it may prove the legitimacy of a part of the bible that the catholic church officially recognises as myth, it does have the downside of proving how much of a cunt god is.
You need some positive reinforcement. Sit down with your friends and tell them all -- at the same time-- that you're having issues with body image and to help you out. Like a reverse intervention of sorts. Tell them you need more positive reinforcement about your looks. Explain that you know there's nothing really wrong, and you're healthy, but deep down you can't get rid of the feeling. Have them help you help yourself-- monitoring your food intake so you don't starve yourself is #1, positive comments about your body, and about bodies in general (outlaw ragging on less flattering body types), positive distractions, maybe partnering with one or more of the girls as a gym buddy?  A therapist is a good idea, but they're just going to reinforce the topics above. IANAD, but I think that talking to your friends and engaging them to help you will do a lot more good than talking it out with a shrink.   Overall know this-- you are never going to change your bone structure. Your wide hips are here to stay, so take comfort in knowing that many women envy this body type (wide sexy hips? hell yeah!) and many men desire it. Your breasts may grow with time, but don't place too much stock in it. Short of surgery there's nothing you can do. I beg you not to starve yourself or feel guilty for eating, because no amount of dieting will change your bone structure or reduce your hip size. It is cool to eat bread and hamburgers and soda (in moderation of course).   Being a teenager and having body image woes is just about as low as it goes. It *does* get better. You don't have to accept that your body is fine just the way it is right now, but make it a long term goal. Get comfortable! Enjoy the fact that you don't have back-problem-inducing breasts. Enjoy the fact that you still fit into jeans small enough to be a model. Heck, enjoy the fact that you are so slim that it is not recommended you donate blood due to your petite body size. Wish I could give more advice!
He's English; you just called him a disobedient donkey =P  Use arse instead!
Same is happening for me.  I still have my original scores though.  I'd guess it's a database problem. I'm sure it will be a-ok within a few days.
Yeah... I don't think it added too much, but I don't think it got in the way either. Just a taste thing...
Are there many rpgs that don't have the typical anime style?  Not aware of many myself.  (other than Oblivion, etc)
I'm quite proud that my people have done something! Hup Holland, Hup!
I took up Nichiren Buddhism (Japanese) specifically SGI USA - it has a twice daily liturgy and you spend time chanting:  &gt;Nam Myoho Renge Kyo  Which is suppose to be the essence of the lotus sutra and a way to connect to the Universe.  Recordings:  http://www.sgi-usa.org/newmembers/resources/chantingpractice.php  It was hell at first as I would be chanting and forget what I was doing and a few minutes later I would be doing dishes instead.  It took some effort to overcome my mindlessness but now I can go for an hour.  After a few minutes I forget about the chanting, doing it automatically, AND THEN the real meditating, clearing and work can be done.  Mind you, I am essentially still an atheist.  Nichiren Buddhism means you have no god, priests or temples - it ends up, you're the object of devotion.  I can live with that.
No, I just don't believe in things without evidence.
What? Just call the number! Worst case scenario: it's a dude pranking you. Then so what? I'll tell you what: ask the girl at the store out anyway!!!!!!! Yeah!!
you don't believe in real-valued physical quantities?  Whats the alternative?  I can see not believing in integer-magnitudes or even rational, but real?
Apply for welfare.
pam makes food taste like plasticy shit IMO
I had a girlfriend murdered in the street when I was in my mid-twenties.  She was 5'-7", beautiful of face and mind, and approx 42-24-36. Reddish-blonde hair down to the small of her back,  sharp as a tack, with a smile that lit up the room and a laugh like that of an angel.  Tough as nails, as quick to forgive as to fight.   It would break my heart, (and possibly wreck my mind) to see her again, but to not have it be *her*.  No, I would clone some *other* "perfect woman".  Clone myself?  Nah. The world's weird enough as it is.
Brass Monkey. Poor a cheap beer into a glass. Top it off with a little orange juice.
It's really not that hard. I bought one a few years ago for pretty cheap (~$120). Learned in about a month.  In fact, this post has inspired me to go outside and ride it around right now. Thanks reddit!
Mr T is all in favor of keeping your fare fresh... or is he all in flavor of it ?.... wait....sorry *sigh
jackassparagus
I thought that was pretty lame to be honest. I can balance on a baby. 
[](/fu)[](/futext)
that sonva....ummm....What does this mean exactly?
Women officers seem to be listened to more when they are mean and taken advantage of less.  Speaking from experience, asking an inmate politely to do something would have a higher chance of being told to fuck off.  Telling them to do something with an attitude would result in being listened to.  Does that make it right?  Certainly not.  But, unfortunately, there wasn't much of a way around it.  I also feel, like in the business world, men can get away with being an asshole while women get a lot more flack for being a bitch.  I think it's because we're conditioned to think women should be kind and nurturing.  That job, however, doesn't allow for kind and nurturing. 
I read it as *All 66" Mac &amp; PC commercials*. I was really wondering how you could judge the size of a commercial.
Photoshop is magical. It can take scratches off old pictures, edit levels, correct red-eye etc. etc. But when we are surrounded by ads, billboards, magazine covers, pictures on the internet, where *everyone* has flawless skin and skinny legs and a perfectly toned stomach, then it has gone too far.  I remember as a kid in elementary school I had [this poster](http://img127.imageshack.us/img127/1625/group42og1.jpg) of the Spice Girls in my bedroom. I remember I would stare at it and then look at my pasty white legs with bruises on them from playing soccer and kickball and how I had rosy red cheeks and my nose was always sunburned eyebrows that you couldn't see really well (I'm naturally blond) and didn't have than arch to them.  I hated my body and face and skin by the 5th grade because of this *one* poster hanging in my room. I had no idea what Photoshop was at the time. I had no idea why they looked so beautiful and perfect. I just knew I didn't look like them.  Terrifying.
I love Evernote. Also a few others: Checkbook, Google Buzz widget is awesome, Hugry!, Google Earth, I like LastFM more than Pandora (that's just me), the Calendar app is crap so check out "Pure Calendar" - it was worth the purchase for me, skyfire is a great browser, cool game I like (that I think a redditor made) is Tribo.   Have fun with your new phone. The Incredible looks awesome - Droid owner here.
wanna pay me an absurd amount of monies?
Where does the R come from?  Also, where are you from @_@
Stop talking.  Don't try to fix things.  When a lady in a relation ship is whining they expect 2 things.  Shut up, agree with them.  Don't fix it.  You have just graduated communications 101.
I love dogs!
The first game I played was [Sleuth](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sleuth_%28computer_game%29) on my dad's 286. I was about three at the time and absolutely terrified.
About enough to fill two one-hitters :( Time to pick up some more
last i checked (jerking-off notwithstanding), Im not fucking myself.  Its a joint effort! A two-way street.  If i say "hey babe, how do you feel about hanging this swing in the corner and playing see-saw", or "let me tie you to the bed and use a bunch of toys, tongue, fingers, etc. and see if I can make you nut fifty times", and Im met with a "Not so much", well that doesn't give me much to work with, now does it?  And whats with this one sided BS about is my job to pleasure my woman??  I thought sex was supposed to be equal pleasure.  Or are you one of those selfish-ass females that likes to recieve but hardly ever gives??  "He can go down on me, but I won't do him, and if I do, than he can't finish in my mouth, blah blah blah, me me me!" 
When ever I see videos from performers like this who have kids, I think that one day those kids will have to socialise with the rest of the world, and I think about all the wonderful conversations they will have...
I use the Coinstar machine sometimes, but I get a Starbucks card with no fee taken out. (Whether Starbucks is a good value is another matter.)  I'll watch somebody ahead of me dumping quarters and dimes into the thing and taking out cash, minus 8.9% or whatever. It makes the hair on the back of my neck stand up. I bet those people don't know how much they are losing, or maybe don't realize there is a fee at all.
New Scotty. (star trek)
how much do you pay for your kiosk?
They did, and then they put him on a plane. Much to his dismay.
[yes - roundabout](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=byeSPOIffVE)
I'd like to think I'm always willing to change my opinion in the face of new facts. Citation, please.
You could see it coming, though.  I didn't know it until I read the interview with Woz in "Founders at Work", but Woz had to fight like mad to get Jobs to agree to include expansion slots on the original Apple II.  It was interesting to see that Jobs was trying to build closed, proprietary computing appliances even back then.
Disclaimer : Ignorant joke, no hate intended.  I see a lot of rap videos with African American rappers rolling in white Rolls Royces with white leather, rocking white suits and white gator shoes. Just saying, white is a 'symbol' of success for some in their eyes. gotta keep the flow.  Although i prefer my cars to be black on black, theyre mysterious and i like to think i am the prince of darkness or something. Im brown, so im halfway there.
Yeah, and it does not even follow that the unzip function has a fixed point. Whether or not a quine is possible depends on the complexity of the language and the function itself.  f(x) = 0 has a fixed point at 0. A broken unzip that uncompresses every input to the empty file could not reproduce a non-empty program text.  f(x) = x + 1 does not have a numeric fixed point, but a quine might be possible if a quotation of the input is written as "+ 1" in this language.
Planetarium?! Thank you for recommending this! 
LZW != arithmetic coding, but I agree with you on the obviousness point.  Fortunately the arithmetic patents are mostly expired by now.  IIRC, the key patents were held by IBM and issued in the mid 80s.  Licensing notwithstanding, arithmetic coding didn't get a lot of mainstream use until the past couple generations of media codecs.  I always hypothesized this had more to do with compute resources than patents though.  For a fixed amount of CPU time, I can usually get better compression by improving the statistical model I feed to a Huffman encoder than by using an arithmetic coder.
I'm with you, I really am.  I'm no free-marketeer going around saying "Born into poverty?  That's your problem! Get a better job!  Fuck you, I got mine!".  But I have to draw the line somewhere.  Being desperately poor might explain why someone would join the army, but I can't enlistees off the hook for signing up to kill people who pose no danger to Americans.  I realize that's easy for me to say this - I have a job, a trade, and a place to live - but some principles are just too important to compromise.  
I didn't see anything in the original post to hint at a lack of confidence on her part. Maybe she is happy with her body and has a naturally low sex drive, then again maybe not. But it seems like a huge assumption given the information provided.
Wow, that's an amazing amount of missing the point, and distorted sense of self-importance.  &gt; Just like gambling, its not a problem until you lose.  I don't think people are complaining because of a regular, free-market-driven stock collapse.  They're complaining because it was a predictable, near-engineered collapse that people like him made millions on.  Nobody's complaining when Wall Street suffers from a downturn in the market like the rest of us.  &gt; What's going to happen when we can't find jobs on the Street anymore? Guess what: We're going to take yours.  We shouldn't attack Wall Street guys because they're going to *steal our jobs*?  What, is there a shadow army of tens of millions of Wall Street traders that are going to flood into our workforce like illegal immigrants?  And apparently they're also going to suddenly develop years of engineering training and take my job too?  &gt; So now that we're going to be making $85k a year without upside, Joe Mainstreet is going to have his revenge, right? Wrong! Guess what: we're going to stop buying the new 80k car, we aren't going to leave the 35 percent tip at our business dinners anymore. No more free rides on our backs.  Good fuck, people still believe in that trickle-down crap?  We're not all gardeners and waiters.  Does he think that somehow the fraction of his income that he spends back into the economy somehow is equivalent to the trillions of dollars that has been bled from the economy as a result of Wall Street's gaming of the system?  Overall this guy seems to be convoluting *personal* gain with *overall gains in the economy*.  If the system is functioning properly, yes, those two things go together. People are angry because these people made money, while the *rest of us lost money and jobs*.  That is no longer the work of a good, hard-working Wall Street banker; it is fraud.
Fuck everything about that
China is all in all very homogeneous. 90% of China is Han Chinese, and that is an incredibly large number considering China's size. The only time you'll see other ethnic groups is if you go to certain parts of China (like Xinjiang or the Manchuria area)
Is there a contest to see how many times this can be reposted in a week that I didn't hear about?
No.
It's an awning.
Chuck E. Cheese was founded by [Nolan Bushnell](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nolan_Bushnell)(Atari Founder), just sayin
#3 and #4 are critical.  Given that Ubuntu borrows its name from the philosophical concept, partially described as:  &gt;Ubuntu speaks particularly about the fact that you can't exist as a human being in isolation. It speaks about our interconnectedness. You can't be human all by yourself, and when you have this quality - Ubuntu - you are known for your generosity.  Mark Shuttleworth brands himself as a "benevolent dictator for life", but it seems he's taking the role too seriously. While "too many cooks spoil the broth" has merit in some cases, asking the community what they want has value. It  seems all decisions are made behind closed doors at Canonical, and then announced to the public, already finalized.  A community that's ignored does not thrive, and I suspect Ubuntu would never have gotten off the ground if not for a number of enthusiastic power users. Alienating them does no good, but plenty of harm.
Meditation
Forgive me... This might be a dumb question, but how did you generate that function? 
I'm pretty sure that is not sweat on the banana
I'll  tell  you  what  really  got  my  goat.  When  Fred  Rogers  died,  Clear  Channel  radio  and  FOX  TV  news,  both  just  reported  Fred  is  Dead,  then  went  right  to  the  Eddie  Murphy  skit  "Mr  Robinson's  Neighborhood."  They  said  next  to  nothing  about  the  man  himself.  Eighty  percent  of  their  obituary  was  a  frickin  SNL  skit. 
Fuck yeah.
&gt;Nicole Minetti, a showgirl turned dental hygienist who he met when his teeth were being repaired after he was attacked in Milan in December   DUDE, seriously how does one become so pimp
Comparing the mentally retarded to Fox and Teabaggers is an insult. You should have more respect for the mentally retarded.
I do know what I'm talking about and I've cited sources (though maybe not in this particular thread). Servers are not ever under any circumstances in the USA allowed to earn less than minimum wage ever. If their wages + tips = minimum wage they can get the lower wage from the employer as long as the server makes enough tips to meet the minimum wage. If the server does not make enough in tips+wages to earn the minimum wage the employer must directly contribute the remainder. That or similar language is in ever summary of minimum wage laws as they apply to tippers.  You can look at a Department of Labor page: http://www.dol.gov/dol/topic/wages/wagestips.htm  ** If the employee’s tips combined with the employer’s direct wages of at least $2.13 per hour do not equal the federal minimum hourly wage, the employer must make up the difference. Many states, however, require higher direct wage amounts for tipped employees.**  There is no situation where it is legal for a server to earn less than minimum wage at any point. Your whole argument isn't anything more than hand waving and hoping everyone else is either ignorant or as dumb as you are.  Maybe you should trim the insults from your posts and start dealing with substantive facts idiot.
And he needs to change his attitude.  Instead of sarcasm, perhaps prayer or thoughtful meditation on what he could possibly do that might help.  Alcoholics may take many years and lower and lower bottoms before they sober up - if they make it that far.  Life is too short too watch your loved one's disappear.
Don't try to put layers on it. Believe me, I **get** it.  I put so much venom against the Watchmen movie on internet boards I was halfway to a dissertation as to *why* Watchmen-as-it-is-loved is *only* possible in a graphic medium.  I will never pass up a chance to tell people to not watch the new Star Trek movie over the old ones.   I **still** idly wonder why the Fantastic Four, John Constantine, and Superman's appeal seem to completely elude anyone in Hollywood.   I was bitching on the internet about how X-Men: The Last Stand was downright criminal and took a shit on what was shaping up to be the Altman of superhero movies as it came out.  But here's the thing, in spite of **all** of that, they're just movies.   Shitty shitty movies made solely under the banner of avarice by businessmen and commercial artists who genuinely and truly believe that if something says 'superhero' then you have a right to lazy plotting, poor characterization and dialogue, and that anything even slightly ridiculous is worth neutering; and that if something says "comic book" and features the *slightest* amount of mysticism, heroism, or action must be **hammered** into the superhero mold; and has their head so far up the cinematic medium's ass that they refuse to acknowledge graphic medium as anything more than detailed storyboards, but movies nonetheless.  Fiction itself is *extremely* mutable and continuity has always meant shit. Go ask anyone who reads the Bible, or any expert in Greek mythology, or Hindu mythology.   It is older than dirt to see someone take any form of mythology and twist the details to serve their own agenda.  Look at what bloody Shakespeare does with Greek myth in A Midsummer Night's Dream, the hack.   And even though Hollywood is a greedy beast, it is arguably more pure in its intention than medieval passion plays, which use the bloody crucifixion as an excuse to forward Anti-Semitism.  Jonah Hex is no more a sacred cow than Jesus or any other piece of mythology and whoever holds the creative license to his character can do **whatever** they want with him. Be glad he's not played by Shia LeBouf and has a robot buddy.   I also know what you're saying about the problem with Hollywood using its wide distribution to sour the public consciousness on a given property. The fact that most people will never give the tiniest shit about Watchmen as a comic but paid good money to see--and dismiss--an inferior movie is a huge source of ire with me.   But it's going to happen, and while you have a right to be angry just know that when you claim Hollywood "rapes your childhood" you're sounding **stupid** and **immature**, no matter the validity of your statement.  If you need to lash out, then lash out. That's ok. I've done it enough. Write up exactly what you feel but don't post it until you've edited it down to a reasoned and mature phrasing that doesn't make your argument seem fallacious. Less people will be able to discredit you via ad hominem and will be more inclined to listen to what you have to say.  That's my point. Just relax. MST3K mantra.  
A million upvotes for this link.. pretty much exactly what I was looking for.  It tells you exactly what kind of road each part of the route is, gives you useful details like elevation and times, and includes a nice streetview link.  You can even choose between busy and quiet rides.  Of course.. it can't deal with remotely long distance routes.  But it's in beta apparently so hopefully it'll evolve and get better for that.
fuck you redditurds,  DRM, Apple, Religion, Oil leaks are all good for you
If there is a devil, then who is the god?
Durarara!!, Arakawa Under the Bridge, Working!!,  Rainbow. Dropped Angel Beats!. 
Yahoo!
A conspiracy to continue, in vain, to keep the phrase "Rush Limbaugh" relevant?
agreed except i liked the ending.
My favorite episode is ["I fuckin' miss Corey and Trevor"](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8T2NLcWoVp0). The opening in the grocery store, often referenced as ["The water bong is so smooth"](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Nad_MavP18I) to me, completely sums up TPB.  *Yes Bubbles, get high, this is fun.*
what a douche, go ahead try and take my job. But first let me really fuck it up and make a mess out of my industry. Then you can come along, get paid less and clean up the mess. Fucking asshole should be hanged in a public place.
Hit triangle in your flash drive and select "display all." I don't think many files show up without doing that. 
What is the installation on the 4th picture? And why are these screens partially submerged in sand?
Last time we did that, population was under 2 billion. Now it's nearly 7. 
It would be awesome to see this in person.
You don't even really need the spoon. Seeds will just fall out. Empty into a bowl and enjoy. 
OH, DIS IS BAD  Edit// I need to get that soldiercopter on a loop.
AND MY AXE.
My HTC Diamond did it.
Unlike swearing however, you cannot just interject weed into the middle of an average sentence.
I'd say it's unrealistic and trumped-up for the cameras, but I've been in the workshops with the guys that work at my stepdad's sheet metal/HVAC/plumbing business. They're just like that. They're always shouting, angry, throwing stuff, and talking badly about whoever's not in the room at the time. Not every work crew is like that - my dad's gas company workers all seemed to be pretty laid back and friendly, usually laughing all day, but I've definitely seen the drama queen side of the work force.
Well, I'm from California, where people generally go accent-less, and I've always said/heard it like "face."
&gt;I don't think there's any age where it's acceptable to vote  Then I guess we're lucky you're not in charge of anything.
Ooh I'm defnitely interested in doing this. I've been trying find some time to learn a bit about the subject using the sparkfun.com tutorials but I think this might be a better way.
I always feel like I won a small local lottery when this happens.  "Oh, okay, here's my commercia....wait, what? FUCK YES"
&gt;concentrated stench blast  I'm going to be using this as a band name.
[Here](http://boincstats.com/stats/project_graph.php?pr=bo) is the source page for the chart. ([Semi-log](http://boincstats.com/charts/chart_uk_bo_project_avg_credits.gif))
Yeah, probably does.  Anyway, got a refund with no hassle.
I have to dig some of those books out and read them again... been  a LONG time.
Same here.  Over a year for me lol.  Ah well who cares, after so long it doesn't matter anymore amirite?
An ultra buffoon.
&gt; The cloud + mobile devices concept (open or closed) is coming, and meets the needs of "everyone else" better than anything we've ever come up with. So we have to deal with its inevitability, and allow that it fills a need we have not otherwise been able to address.  You mean as inevitable as the thin client was in the mid 90s? Or as clearly superior as mainframes with dumb terminals were a decade before that?
You're... talking to yourself...  but yay! Spirited Away! Which dub is it going to be?
I dissagree with the less brutal part.
"Alpha male" is very much a social theory, the same way feminism and their belief in the patriarchy is. However, both can be studied in a scientific way; for instance, through psychological research regarding gendering, and statistical research regarding significant differences. Either way, that's besides the point. You picked a definition of "alpha male" and refuted it. The same way I can attribute feminism a label of "male-bashing lesbians" and refute that. I would be just as dishonest.
Everyone should listen to Vibert aka Wagon Christ aka Plug aka Kerrier District aka Amen Andrews etc etc
No, I'm on 1.6.  So the first steps for me is trying to downgrade to 1.5.   Unfortunately, when I try to downgrade using the sappimage.nph (or whatever it's called) the process goes something like this.  Fastboot Phone Checks for sappimage.nph Finds it and asks me if I want to install. I say yes. It starts the installation. Little blue bar in the upper right hand corner fills up. Says checking signature. BOOOOOOM HEADSHOT.....Update failed!  Model version older. That's when I found the goldcard method.  But than it continued to do the same thing.  Gonna mess with it more tonight after my pysch. exam. If anyone has any suggestions, please don't hesitate to let me know.  I'm up for just about anything at this point.
Oops, Type-Os suck. sorry.
&gt; suppose we set a timer interrupt and want to busy wait for some number of milliseconds until some operation has been performed, for instance  In that case, you're either calling some `time()` function, which won't be optimized away, or you're accessing a `volatile` time value, which also won't get optimized away. If you're just straight-up doing an old-school dumb wait like:   for (int i = 0; i &lt; 10000; i++); /* waits about 1 sec */  That's a pretty specific edge case and you can probably find a way to keep the compiler from eating that (like calling an empty function in the loop).
How much Korean can you speak? How and when did you learn it?
kiri, kiri, kiri, kiri...
My bad.  That'd make it the SAPPIMG.NBH.
Well I tried reading through, because I never even learned functions in my maths class. But there's problems that say things like 'The temp in city X is W(t) degrees Fahrenheit t hours after sundown at 5:00 pm. The function W(t) is W(t)=0.1(400-40t+t^2) for 0&lt;t&lt;12' and then they give me a graph and I just look at it like O.O I've never learned them and I have no clue what I'm doing. 
I'd tend to agree.
We deal with monthly browser vulnerabilities anyway.  Meanwhile, it's 2010, CSS hasn't yet standardised how to do the rounded corners that everyone has been doing with Photoshop for a decade or so, and it's still easier to do a whole bunch of real world layouts using table tags that HTML had in the mid-90s.  The reason web standards move slowly is that the culture has evolved to respect the W3C and promote compliance with W3C standards, but the W3C isn't stepping up with the innovation required. Hewitt is entirely correct in his assessment here, IMHO, and I've noticed the early stages of what could become a significant backlash against the standards evangelists over the past few months. I think the developer community is starting to get fed up of the obvious lack of progress.
Shocking.
Go on...
Super Mario Bros. on the NES. 
not if its name is Robert Paulson...
Its flavor resembles sun-dried grapes.
Oil-based product includes gasoline.
There's also one down in Madison ([Bill the Butcher](http://www.billthebutcher.us/)) if that is closer to your area.
Actually these tests seem kind of pointless. We know that loud noise is bad for people. Do we really need to deafen 300 chinchillas a year to verify that fact?
I'd say more reality too.  They obviously edit out all the times they get along just fine, and show you the times they get pissed at each other.  Most "reality" shows have scripted fights, where a producer will tell someone to fight with or get angry at someone else.  I sincerely doubt this happens in Deadliest Catch.  I rarely even see the producers/cameramen talk, even in the behind the scenes episodes.
Dude, you don't know much about Jay-Z do you? He has a song called Lucifer...
I'd like to know more about that too, but I don't really see what he could be talking about. Compilers go from a high level language to assembly . . . what was this compiler compiling to?
Better dead than Red [Wing]
Goddamn you. I will be crying for years.  I love cats so fucking much.
I didn’t see any video, just a bad picture with sound.
&gt;Blah blah blah my internet penis is absolutely huge blah blah blah.  Whatever.
be proud of yourself, man.  there is nothing wrong with you.  
Natalie Portman. I like my women with both talent and brains.  If she's not available . . . Keira Knightley will do nicely. 
those ruskies roll deep
lol
ro0021
You seem upset. Just posting my opinion. I know how poor goons are, you should stop posting here and do some missions to buy a station for them. 
&gt; So compilers should be aware of Fermat's Last Theorem so that they can determine whether these types of loops terminate?  No. A compiler should do whatever it thinks gives the most reward (speedup) for its efforts (how many types of loops it recognizes). A loop that it is unsure about (like this one) should simply not be optimized away. Only those loops that are guaranteed to terminate (by whatever effort the compiler wishes to endure) can be removed.  Think of it this way - the burden of proof is on the compiler. If it wishes to remove a loop, it must prove it does terminate and it has no side effects. If it can't prove this, it can't remove the loop.  &gt; I can't think of any case where you'd want to enter an infinite loop that had no side effects on values outside the loop (including no memory accesses).  It doesn't matter what you can and can't think of. What matters is if a compiler, claiming to compile the C language, actually conforms to the C language.  (Edit: thinks, not things. Minor thinko!)
&gt;"sarah palin is now pregnant with his child"  OMG
her?
Ask why they aren't.
MADE IN AMERICA.MADE IN AMERICA.MADE IN AMERICA.MADE IN AMERICA.MADE IN AMERICA.`This product is so shit that we have to use nationalism as a marketing campaign.`MADE IN AMERICA.MADE IN AMERICA.MADE IN AMERICA.MADE IN AMERICA.
Yep!
44. ''you put the 'cute' back in persecution...'' and i take the "the" out of psychotherapist
[Me too!](http://imgur.com/5minj.png)
Probably from somewhere with a [non-rhotic](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rhotic_and_non-rhotic_accents) accent, most likely Britain, Australia, certain parts of America. Think of an English person saing 'bars'. No 'r' sound.
Yes, I know. I suppose that it may be due to spanish folk being a much more combative people, so the left wouldn't dare to take that much rights from the people, who are mostly conservatives (and even those who are not enjoy hunting).  Brazilians are good-hearted and softies by nature. As the English put it: "the portuguese don't kill the bull". We are the only latin american country where the encounter between europeans and indians, instead of a genocide, produced an orgy :) There's much of indian culture in the brazilian way (an indian dialect was normaly spoken in portuguese houses in Brazil until 1808, when the Portuguese king fled from Napoleon to Brazil).
Might as well use people who've been sentenced to death row. The way they carry out those deaths is often agonising torture anyway; why not feed two birds with one crumb and gain something for science while we're torturing people?  Sigh. I'm sure that at this point in our society and technological advancement that this isn't necessary.
Five minutes on the google - http://www.muhajabah.com/my_niqab_story/ayesha_umm.php Seems the problem many of these women have is not that anyone makes them wear a veil, but that some people think it's OK to bully them for wearing it.
You, my young friend, have yet to see the incredible level of depravity this drug can inspire. Pooping on a dog is the least of a true drunk's worries.
Dear good sir, may I introduce you to Mr. O'Brien? He is a avid read of monocle weekly. I am sure you two will have many things to talk about. Do carry on! I have to freshen up in the loo. 
You articulated my feelings perfectly... ::sniffle::
im not familiar with that band. just incase, my account name is from Band of Horses. Everything all the Time is an album of theirs.
I'm just saying, if you're a kid and you're pickpocketing, it's more likely than not that you don't really know the value of a dollar.
America..., fuck yea!
The right is fine with police state tactics and economic fascism if implemented by conservatives and Republicans, just as the left is fine with police state tactics and economic fascism if implemented by liberals and Democrats. The right didn't oppose these tactics when implemented by George Bush and the left isn't opposing these tactics when implemented by Barack Obama.
Good luck not standing up for yourself.
[This](http://i.imgur.com/WRIfG.png) concerned me more.   but seriously that site is terrible. Searched for a good 5 minutes for the location of this place to see if it was close and couldn't find anything. I love chinchillas :'(
i like post-rock and don't like these guys :(
A PC with a wireless router, running Tversity Media Server or PS3 Media Server, can stream the video to your PS3.
kkjjhjhjigkjhgnhhjmnghnbjhghnhnjkhnkn
I am in my mid twenties. However, I don't see why invoking the memories of Maggie Thatcher (who stopped being prime minister in 1990) alone is enough justification to attack the conservative party **20 years later**.  Surely that in itself is a pretty weak argument? Also you must accept that things change, and as far as I know, Maggie and David Cameron are not the same person. There has been a 20 year gap in which society has changed significantly.  As for the Lib Dems, it seems that they have everybody convinced that 2010 conservatives are identical to the 1990's conservatives. It just seems to me that the lib dems are taking maximum advantage of their lack of being in power in the last few decades...
Florida. They've been making them for something like 50 years IIRC.  edit: I saw it on Food TV once, but I'm having difficulty finding anything on the 'net. [Here's something close](http://www.inhabitat.com/2007/07/26/mickey-mouse-sustainable-farming/).
haha well done, was not expecting that
WTF B's????? Are you kidding me when I was in EE I wished I had those grades. I was in the C range.   But if you want motivation here it is, fresh out of college companies judge you by your grade. When I applied during my last quarter, I instantly get emails asking for my GPA. My GPA was bad, so I constantly get emails telling me why I did not get an interview and 99% of time it's my GPA, despite the fact that I've worked full time for 2 years now.  I learn the hard way that for Engineering jobs they want to see your grades and know that you did well in school. I have friends who graduated with 3.5+ GPA and started their first job with 60K-70K salaries.
Liar. All of you. Liars.
My pleasure. Just spreading the knowledge!
I doubt it. Does the GameCube not have a Wii style video out at all? If the cable idsardi points to doesn't help, you may be SOL.  In general, this subreddit is for tinkerers, so I'll tell you know what I know about the two standards and why you're unlikely to find a cheap converter: What has to happen to go from NTSC ('yellow component RCA video') encoding to any VGA setting (which now supports many resolutions to NTSC's one) is that the video signal must be read through an ADC into a buffer and resampled appropriately for your particular monitor. This gets the signal to the right resolution for your monitor, which may not even have the same aspect ratio as a 4:3 television. Then, an analog VGA signal has to be constructed from this resampled data and sent out to the monitor. (There are probably analog ways to do the resampling, too, but I doubt they're commonly used). Especially because your monitor's resolution could be one of a large number of possible values, it takes a certain amount of intelligence to do the conversion.
It may just be because I have ADD and therefore am prescribed the stuff for real, but I've never found Adderal to make me more social - quite the opposite.  If I've taken Adderal I'd much rather go off by myself and play around with programming stuff or a new game.  Without it, I'm more able to actually be interested in people. I think that actually having to focus on people and listen to them tends to reveal that there's not much worth listening to...
Well the point being, the pool of science and engineering majors is overpopulated as well as demonstrated by the terrible low salaries and lack of jobs.  I know UPS drivers who make more than my friends with masters degrees.
Oh, not that shit again.
Hmm, Which humans specifically are we talking about...
yes... doing many exercises wrong can lead to injury... That being said I don't see a use for having a trainer for a very long time... Maybe a couple weeks to get the basics done and thats it...
did we just become best friends!?
Thanks for the leads. 
Of course if you happen to live in Sheffield Hallam, Witney or Kirkcaldy and Cowdenbeath, in which case your vote might have more impact on who is able to to become prime minister (at least initially) and you do get to vote for at least one of the possible future PM's, even if it is for the post of your local representative. This point has come up again and again, although it does seem that most people are fairly aware of the facts, but rather ignore them on the basis that their vote does have an impact on who will be invited to form a government...   There is another issue however that is not often explored. That is whether a strong party leader (and a strong 'central office') is desirable, after all parties are there to keep their MP's in line to a certain degree, it is arguable that a weak party and a weak party leader means that more autonomy and indeed more power is devolved (nt the right term, but you get my drift) to individual MP's in that party, it also means that the government cannot rely on a majority to push its issues through... Of course taking that point to it's logical conclusion (that you choose between a representative who represents you, or a party that represents you...)  gives some weight to the argument that people should vote on the basis of national matters and indeed do so tactically on the basis of party preference, rather than on local matters and constituency issues.
A friend of mine from a local used bookstore designed a simple rpg-style board game for Team Fortress.  My only contribution to it during beta-testing was rolling for ping before each turn.
Yep, same two.
hahahahaha  this chick is hot
&gt;our point being that only the rich  You are familiar with the concept of false dichotomy, correct? You've just presented one. Obviously nobody would recommend someone who can't at all feed or clothe their child to have one unless they wish ill upon the child. Between that and a couple like Bill and Melinda Gates there is all sorts of people who vary between suitable and unsuitable homes to rear children.
Also "from for" wtf is with that? Terrible title writing all around. 
i actually just took a job fairly close to that course, so I am definitely hitting it up soon.  is it a longer course?  i'm trying to get ready for a Big Lid tourney in a month so Sedgley is perfect for that  oh, and apologies if I have hit you or scared you with a close one
Or a flipbook.
A post office with a box with my address on it.
I assume you strangled that devils spawn before it could rape your mother.
I'm deeply saddened for the families and friends of the workers who were lost while doing their jobs.   My point being, something happened that should not have, and now BP is left scratching their heads over what to do next. There should have been, and there should be, a PLAN in place for every conceivable action, but for the very least, a way to turn the flow off in case of trouble. Obviously, that did not work. It's *not* the fault of the workers on that rig, but of the engineers who planned this whole structure and the people who paid for it to go online before being as close to 100% certain that oil will stay where it should in case of emergency.  BTW, I did not jump to any conclusions, just stated an obvious fact.
Cats suck.
I often call it the reddit circle jerk. Too many young morons that think they know something. BTW, I hope the kid gets the full 20 years for thinking the ends justify the means. Too many idiots think this way. 
You are not wrong, I don't think. Both 1 &amp; 2 allude to 'consciousness' being necessary for classification as 'sentient'. Consciousness is something humans have while most (if not all - dolphins etc may fit the bit) animals do not.  Chinchillas are not sentient.
Cheshire cat for sure.
&gt;Just because it is derived from that, doesn't mean that this 'elastic fluid model' is actually the underlying physical reality.  Just because you're saying this doesn't mean, you can change history.  &gt;We never derive anything from experiment....We derive things from hypothetical postulates or known truths from these postulates.  Do you believe, Einstein would base his theory on constant speed of light, if he would know, the M-M experiment gives a different result? Come on, please...;-)   BTW Who is "we"? Are you member of some sect? Speak for yourself. Which physical law did you really derived? Scientists are deriving postulates from observed/measured reality. They measure something and assume, such finding is valid generally - this is how relativity or quantum mechanics were derived: by generalization of particular findings.  &gt;You can even go back to physics...if you learn where the bottom line of truth comes from: reality versus . we derive things from hypothetical postulates  Now you can see, how inconsistent your blurbs are at the very end. So are the bottom line of your "truth" really hypothetical postulates, or the observed reality?
Wait a minute, you're not my boyfriend. 
Sweetie, do your little dance routine for Grandma.............
Hmm, sounds exactly like one of my friends. You wouldn't be located in Washington by any chance?
vase as in bass. or base. 
Anybody else realize that Treena Lahey is Ellen Page? 
&gt; I'm not sure how it went with this atheist.  But I hope some seeds were planted.  Willful ignorance. I hates it.   I recently stood up for my atheist beliefs to a newly reformed Christian friend. I was never able to defend my faith back in the day when I was thought I was Christian so it surprised me. Our conversation also was circular and here's a part of it:  She starts with, "What makes your heart beat?"  I say, "My blood."  "What makes your blood pump?"  "Uh, my muscles."  "What makes your muscles move?" (at this point, I can't figure out where she's going with this, or what answer she wants)   "Electrical impulses sent by my brain."  "And what tells the impulses what to do?"  "Neurons...  ...?" (High school was forever ago... my memory struggled)  She gives me a blank stare  "Uh, synapses... firing."  She says, "You can't explain everything!"  I say, "You're right. I don't -know- everything. But I'll answer your questions as best as I can and when I can't, I'll turn to a doctor, or a scientist, someone who has the education and training--and I'll get you an answer."   Ultimately, neither of our stances changed, or were influenced by the other. And she finally broke the conversation to show me a random music video with a curt explanation that 'If you put your trust in God, you don't need any answers."  I shook my head, "That's not enough for me anymore. The answers matter."  **tldr**; similar argument with friend -- christian vs atheist = circular   edited for formating issues...grrr x2
The most talked about party of 2010 will undoubtedly be Kates Party. The highly publicised event is extremely exclusive and only a select few have received invitations. Are you going to Kates Party? Kate's party is going to be the biggest party so far for 2010.. yussss... AND ITS HAPPENING!
I agree with this and it's excellent advice.  Though sometimes time is of the essence and it's nice to have a plan to fall back on.  Of course all plans can be altered on the go.
I'm glad you now understand that many organs do come from dead donors.  &gt; No, if you have one insurance type that covers the cost of transplants then you'd expect it to be relatively expensive. If you have a second that doesn't cover that cost well then that should cost no more then it does now.  That's exactly what I said. Again, it would raise the cost of some insurance, not affect others. Overall the cost would increase, while depriving many people of body parts for their survival. I'm glad we agree. It's a strong argument against selling body parts.  &gt;If you had a choice between dying or taking a transplant (from someone compatible) that wasn't ideal (e.g. liver from an alchy or heart from someone obese.) Would you do it? You'd likely get at least some time out of the "non-ideal" organ while they try and find an "ideal" one.  *They can do that now. People don't.* People could get those poor organs now. When you're already dying due to a failing organ, taking another weak one doesn't help. You need a healthy one. Having it cost money wouldn't change that.  &gt;How is that different from someone wanting to end it early to collect life-insurance or save their family the medical bills from their treatment? I mean, yes, its a really shitty thing to have happen but its also fairly uncommon.  Life insurance pays out the same regardless of when you die. It's also against virtually all life insurance policies to pay out on suicide. Additionally, being unable to afford to continue care due to lack of money is different than getting money to die early. That's buying part of someone's life. It's a strong argument against placing value on human body parts. I do agree that it is shitty though.  &gt; There is currently exploitation by the Chinese and I don't see anyone doing anything about it. As far as selling a person goes, see my previous example with adoption.  Again, we've already established that it's illegal in China. Either way, Chinese legal enforcement doesn't matter. In China people buy wives and sell daughters, or even kill them because they're only allowed to have one child. That doesn't make selling body parts good. It seems more to me like an argument against it.  Again, while birth mothers often get money, *she still doesn't have to turn over the baby*. Adoptive mothers often want to give up their children, just as organ donors want to donate their organs. However a contract in that regard in unenforceable, even in exchange for payment. You can't legally sell people, even a baby. [Please read more](http://www.associatedcontent.com/article/1730428/how_is_baby_selling_different_from.html) [or here](http://encyclopedia.adoption.com/entry/baby-selling/53/1.html)  &gt;This is a far cry from human trafficking. One requires essentially kidnapping someone and taking them somewhere to basically be a slave while the other requires an adult making an informed choice or leaving that choice with people he/she trusts. These are two quite different things.  Learn more about human trafficking. People usually aren't kidnapped. They're usually tricked into it or sold into it by family members in financial need. The exact same thing would happen if value was placed on parts of their body as on the whole. Again, a powerful argument against selling body parts.  After all of these arguments against selling for body parts, there's no good argument in support of it. It would cost everyone more, shorten many lives, provide no additional benefit, and generally hurt people in a variety of ways. That's why it's universally illegal, and open donation is allowed.
THANK YOU!
I forgot.
By that logic we should have no drug laws, no prostitution laws, no speed limits... actually we should just throw out the legal system all together for that matter.  Saying "people will do it anyway" isn't a good enough reason.  And no, I venture to say if it were banned the number of abortions would plummet.  *Some* women would still seek out black market abortions but it would almost certainly not be the majority.
cant unsee
It's all an act.
Damn, we're not old enough to go to a casino, plus I don't think there are any casino's in Austin.
here's the thing with that - unless you have a Real Doll that is going to stay the same shape, size, never be in a mood, never have wants other than yours, most guys will at some point be less attracted to their SO.  It will go up and down with moods, stress levels, and hormone levels.  Girls do this as well.  When someone CRAVES you, and they feel sexy themselves, it turns you on more than just looking at them and thinking "do I want to have sex right now?".  If she were comfortable with looking and acting sexy and then she craved an orgasm with him, I bet he would be turned on like he had just met her.  There is just something about maintaining a healthy attitude and working to keep each others mental state up.  If he shows her she's beautiful, and she shows him he's hot stuff to her, things work out a lot better.  In time he will fill his brain up with mental images of her reach for his cock out of desire and need, her toying herself, toying with him, etc.  I'm not saying he won't still use porn.  Pretty much everyone does that and that is COMPLETELY NORMAL.  Making it known and not feeling bad for it is a step in relaxing their minds as well.  Being relaxed about sex is KEY as you get older and are in a long term relationship.  If you don't feel judged or guilty you only look forward to it and it becomes playful.  It's hard to be attracted to someone who doesn't playfully reach for you or tease you visually or mentally.  It's even harder to be attracted to someone who judges you, makes you feel incapable, or makes you feel undesirable.
It's not technically an R. It's the same sounding A is in father.
paradoxical?
MC=MB  I see nothing wrong here.
Something tells me that's either not what I was thinking, or a really bad security question.
I'm hoping that's what they mean, since that's pretty much all I've done for the last 4 years.  Of course, the definition of "a lot of math" varies greatly with the speaker, so I could find myself disappointed.
I've visited Northern Virginia more than once. Nice place.  *Not* exactly the most diverse place I've ever been by a long shot.
Cheeseburger Walrus!
I ordered from amazon.ca on Wednesday, and got a key this morning. And yes, it worked immediately.  I'm in the UK, though. One of my Canadian friends is getting a little present in a coupla months :)
I fucking remember this movie as a child...barely.lol
Why would I go to a library to read manga? Anime and Manga are something to be enjoyed alone in the dark in your room surrounded by beer cans and figurines. 
never give up man! You're way too young. 
Upvote for post show fact check...
I thought drinking a nice cup of green tea in the morning was the best idea I had. Don't go near energy drinks as you'll probably crash two hours through (if you're into that sort of thing).   Also, my brother forgot his calculator. Don't make the same mistake.  Good luck!
Well yes, but that's not the point. The point is the quote sounds cool :P
Somebody needs to app-ify this for the common man. I know what all those things mean, but can I be bothered to learn how to do it?
I do get an error in both the dev tools on Chrome/Safari and in Firebug, but it still seems to load quickly.  Seems to be bitching about, what appears to be, an XSS request.  
So youre the robot?
Sorry, I can't find it :( You will just have to believe me.
Honestly it was a great experience up until a few months ago.  I held on to it so long because I really loved the mouse, despite the eventual flaws.  If I could have gotten another one as a replacement, I definitely would have!
&gt;I'm from California, where people generally go accent-less I find people from California have a pretty noticeable American accent.
&gt; Does it need to be proprietary? I would be happy enough to run my own mini-cloud for myself and for others. I imagine other organizations would as well.  Yes.  "Running your own cloud" with redundancy, reliability, and security, is no simple task.  Nor is it cheap.  It takes scale to make cloud storage work.  &gt; I argue that there is every value for Google in this. [...]  Sorry, I didn't see anything in there about actual value for Google.  Yes, they have been pushing open standards for many things.  Yes, they have lots of talented engineers.  How does any of this make is valuable for them to interface with your cloud?  Google pushes open web standards because it makes their job easier.  Ubiquitous web means that Google can target you with ads everywhere.  Google publishes public APIs because it ties other things to their services.  Google maps mashups keep Google maps as the premier maps service.  However, allowing you to store your gmail on a different cloud service gives them nothing.  It reduces their lock-in.  It complicates their infrastructure.  It reduces customer confidence.  (Who will you blame when the service goes down?)  They get nothing in exchange for making the backend open.  Google likes open standards when openness helps them, and they love proprietary things when it doesn't.  We've never seen Google's ad server code, or their Map-Reduce implementation.  We've never seen their Gmail backend or indexing technologies.  We've gotten some basic ideas from their published papers, but their core technology is very much proprietary.
You're right, we should completely reconfigure our society to support the needs of hostile foreigners.  It's the liberal thing to do.
Actually, it's not 7.5. I did it without paper, so I left the x^2 thing...  you must take the parenthesis by multiplying them (4x^2-25=5)  Then put the x in one side and the normal numbers in the other (4x^2=5+25)  Then transfer the 4 to the other side (x^2=30/4)  then take the square root of both sides (x=[30/4]^(1/2))
the parents bit warmed my heart.
8=D
have sex with 40 different women. youre goign to break up with your gf anyway, get started on the fun now
School teaches you more than just academics. Home-schoolers are usually noticeable as just a little socially awkward, because they haven't practiced/learned every iteration of social skills in a public setting. The dorms are good because they teach you, socially, how to be a college student.
It had a great front page of section B layout in the Times
I'll take it.  I'm already mod of 4 other subreddits, from the smaller size of 30 members, to a subreddit with 1000 members.   I am very much a Fringe fan, it's my favorite show on TV right now, including Lost.   I'm also very active on reddit, spending around anywhere from 2-6 hours per day here.   With a little advertising in soem of the scifi themed subreddits, I'm sure I could have several hundred new members in no time at all.  Fringe is a very popular show on reddit, we just need a place to discuss it.   
simultaneously putting their sunglasses on
Part of my response was to make them feel more comfortable wearing long clothes, even in summer.  As for "back then," Alexander Hamilton fought to legalize infanticide in New York State when he was in the government here (I am in New York). His argument, according to some scholar, was that polite women should be allowed to kill their own newborns so they can re-enter polite society. I have to admit it is hard for me to go that far, but, I can see the point. Raising a mutant with eight arms and sixteen legs would make someone very unwelcome among "normal" company, not to mention "polite society."
hey now. She said she FEELS fat, not that she *is* fat. Body dysmorphic disorder is real, and there's no reason to be mean and assume that she just wants her ego stroked. :P
link?
 &gt;
Wow. Gaddafi and I are of a similar mind. That's disturbing.
nice!
 4 20....  20/5 = 5  4+5=9  20 / two numbers = 10  Edit: eien_geL   looks like you are one step closer to solving the muster just plus one...  Oh my god. 9 11.
The bromance is over,dude. 
I say it so that it rhymes with 'jazz'.
&gt; symbiosis is not necessarily mutually beneficial. Parasitism is a form of symbiosis.  Yah I know, I said I agreed with Calitude. I meant that I *should* know that symbiotic was not the right word choice in my original post. :)
It is a fairly widespread issue.  The admins are aware of it, [here is a relevant thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/announcements/comments/by0qn/a_reddit_experiment_help_us_catch_spammers_by/c0p4abu).
A copy is different than a Quine: a Quine *reads no input*, it is entirely self-contained. The ability to copy itself emerges from the complexity of the language itself, not external I/O.
Hide and go poop them.  [instructional video](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=g-WVC2JsJ9o)
I found myself lying on top of a really ugly girl furiously making out with her in the gutter between two parked cars and covered in garbage.  When my friends rescued me, I realized a crowd of about 20 people was standing around looking at us.  Among the crowd was a girl I had been dating for a while and hoped to keep dating. I wouldn't. 
Racists.
Nah, you don't. It's clearly a horrid position to be in, but I' sure he'll make the best of it and be A-ok.
How fucking high are you?  That =/= sense.
Possibly, but not likely.  *Everything* in OP indicates lack of confidence to me, someone who has been there, done that, and was the cause of it. The only other viable alternative that I could glean from the OP's explanation is that she's seeing someone else, but even that doesn't seem to fit.  
well, for me at least, that would be the same as "face".  Are you pronouncing face differently?
She's got those bangs to cover her 8 mile long forehead.
I heard somewhere that theres a petition to turn tom Sawyers island in disneyland into a "Lost" island atraction, where you get to walk around, walk into the hatches and stuff, hear whispers in the middle of the jungle, that would be so bad ass if it were true!!
gotta like a guy who takes the time to do something like that. 
You have to TALK LOUDER!
This is one of those situations where 'epic' is appropriate.
My desk is covered in things, well organized things that are laid out parallel to everything else, because although Im not stupid I am obssessive compulsive.
i want another me, but a clone wouldn't be me, since she wouldn't have my upbringing.
THATS SOOO FAR!
I think I love you.
That's what torrents are for!
  &gt; But it IS a better moral choice. &gt; How about one undeniable reason why?  See Stephen Clark quote that I posted. "It is never proper to be the cause of avoidable ill."
What's Canada? 
Did anyone else notice the girl doing a head-stand with her legs spread wide open?  No? No one?
Is it just me or does Mike Rowe seem like one of the nicest, best guys on earth?  I'm straight, but that guy turns me into melted butter.  His voice, his manner, and even his mannish good looks... what a damn package.
this is so gross.... i dont even know what to say.
Ask Robin to pass you the Pigeon-Repellent Spray. 
&gt;once you give them an inch, they'll take a yard Yeah, but not the type of yard that equals three feet.  A yard the size of the one out front of the White House, or maybe a ship yard.
It is.
Hey! Yes you (hits bowl) can!
speed y vodka ftw! :D
I had a housemate who would snack in her car.  After about a week she would unload all the debris that had accumulated in her car, onto the garage floor.  She would throw about 20 empty diet pepsi cans (diet because she was "healthy" and "fit"), and about a dozen or more cracker/cookie boxes on the floor and leave them there, week after week--Nilla Wafers, NutterButters, Cheezits, Waverly Wafers...you name it.  Just really embarrassing crap.  All over the floor and it would pile up for weeks.  I would get so embarrassed for her, I couldn't look her in the eye.  I felt like she had this weird secret life that I was somehow spying on.  Not too terrible, but it really got under my skin after a while.
D.U.M.P. 
unfair..  I submitted [this](http://www.reddit.com/r/youtube/comments/ax7y6/youtube_channel_with_every_episode_of_trailer/) Like 3 months ago..  Where's my up votes? :( lol
On the other hand - where I come from, people pronounce it like raise.
You really meant to post this is r/drugs, didn't you?  I won't tell.
I will say, though I think you are correct in believing the person is verbally communicating an emoicon, I know I have said "Sadface" in response to something bad before without any relation to the computer counterpart and I believe predating even when I would get 93 3.5" AOL Version 2.0 disks in the mail a week.
I think you're forgetting the "marketable skills" portion of the resume/interview.   These guys are specialized. When the question comes up in the interview "why did you leave your previous position" and their answer is "because the public didn't understand the financial markets" I don't think they're getting the job.
I have a big problem with a translation ordered by a tyrannical king. Isn't it just common sense that someone with power would order the translators to say anything that will allow him to maintain his power, and frame Kings in a good light?
&gt; What do you mean by us? Mexican? American? Armenian? Mexican illegally living in the U.S? An American with Mexican heritage? An alien from Pluto? A Native American?  Maybe I am reading too much of the subtext, but to me this feels like a request for me to legitimize my right to complain.  &gt; You are a most interesting individual, do continue.  Thanks for the observation and the permission.  &gt; Anyway, in America, we would appreciate people who come here, in whatever way, respect our laws and our citizens. It is not happening in Arizona, so say 70% of the citizens there by supporting this new law.  Well professor, there are all kind of people in the world. This country has long benefited by the work that a servile brown skinned almost slave labor force has provided, they do things that most average Americans feels is beneath them. This work force is paid as little as possible because, guess what? The poor suckers can't complain so they ain't gonna tell anybody. So when their children or the less passive among them decide not to continue in their subservient roles they try to break out, but guess what? There are no opportunities out there for uppetty  beaners, the opportunities left to survive are crime and vice ( something no sane person could condone but, sane people can see the roots). You are seeing the classic result of exploitation, if you do  not believe just pick up a history book every once in a while (as watered down as they are you would still be surprised).  So 70% of the population are scared, there is a crime epidemic out there, it just so happens that there are a lot of brown faces among the criminals so in a case of "post hoc ergo propter hoc" ( after it therefore because of it, just in case you latin is rusty), they condemn the whole dammed race. Nice huh. &gt; In a quick summary, why do think the citizens of Arizona should not be able to pass any law they want?  Because it is an ignorant law that converts their fears and their prejudices into a tool that can be used to hurt anybody that may be disliked because of xenophobic tendencies.   Because the people that lit the ovens in Auschwitz were obeying a law that was passed by people who though they were entitled to pass it. By this point I guess we are well passed the point where we should invoke Godwin's law. 
This reminds me of the novel "The Fall of Chronopolis."  Time-traveling ships dealing with propagating waves of changes at regular intervals, and everything.
I can totally send you some! Crispies are the best of all M&amp;Ms ever. No one should have to miss out on that :(
I never meant to imply that there is a 100% chance to get a proc every 10 seconds. Simply that over a long period of time based on the numbers I was given that you would **average** one proc every 10 seconds.  6 ticks/second means you'd get 0.12 pps instead of 0.1 and therefore you'd get a proc (on average over a long period of time) every ~8 seconds.  Also, VerticalEvent's math is fine until he implies that 22.5% chance of a proc per tick means you'll get a proc about every 5 seconds. If OP is at the haste soft cap a ~20% chance would imply a proc on the order of about 10 seconds.  (Also 100 - 88.5 = 21.5 but I wasn't going to pick nits)
What compiler does an embedded program usually use? It *feels* odd that they would be using Visual C or gcc. Of course, I have no experience in embedded systems, so that was a random guess.
yep, the acid did him a world of good.
[Reddigg](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddigg/) will soon be a reality.
I work at FedEx and this makes me afraid to go to work tonight.  (We don't have any female package handlers, much less cute ones.)
Divorce is all about custody and property.  If there's no kids and no real assets and she's agreeable, you can do it yourself.  In my case we had kids and property, and since we weren't angry at each other we just went to a mediator who drew a line down the middle of a whiteboard and wrote his and hers on either side.  We did the main agreement in one afternoon.  Good luck.
In the beginning, like 1996, ActiveX was definitely about downloadable code; it was MS's answer to Java. Did they restrict it later? In any case, there should be a middle ground. Firefox should use the native codec system, and supply a way for the user and the distro to configure which codecs to use.
Send him a dozen roses at work.  (Worked for me!)
And you all thought it was just a kids game!
Better to do both. Change and then delete.
You can get an electric burner for less than $20.  like this one http://amzn.to/bRdJNK  usually at target, or where ever.  You may be able to find one used at goodwill.  worth it if you'll be gas-less for more than a week or so. This allows for just about anything, since you can use your regular pots and pans.   If not, remember things like oatmeal, cous cous, bulgar wheat (tabouleh), quinoa, and so on.   Eggs come out ok in the microwave, if you beat them with cream/milk, and then pause &amp; stir often.  microwave  some chopped onion &amp; pepper until tender with a bit of butter, add eggs &amp; milk, grate some cheese into it = kind of a western scramble, add a dash of hot sauce.  Bacon works in the microwave too. also - used crock pot from goodwill:  soups, ribs, tons of recipes out there.  put stuff in, turn it on, go to work, come home, dinner! Is your hot water gas too?
Really?? Who searches for jobs this way?
&gt; we were there largely in a peacekeeping manner  Keeping the peace is a noble cause, but it wouldn't have been necessary if the US hadn't pointlessly invaded and blown everything up.  &gt; You can, I suppose, although I don't think that is their intention at all.  If you signed up post-2003 (certainly in the past 3 years, as this post's subject did) and didn't intend to kill and be killed in some shithole for no real benefit to America, then you got played.  
i thought it was imgURL up until right now
What the hell is Canada?
To tell you the truth,   Before I clicked:  =|  After I clicked: =|
The tickets are now diamonds!
I apologize for the entire US.
That's nothing. I've crossed creeks before on no wheels!  I was walking...  ...on a bridge.
Every countries on the planet have trade restrictions. Unless someone want to argue that Palestine can't make decisions as a country or some bull crap, I don't see anything newsworthy here.
Investments as in stock; something that could be liquidated fast. 15k might be the max to deposit and write-off when putting money in an Ira.
Sounds more fun than living on a crappy island with a bunch of dudes. 
I talk from experience. Unfortunately i was the guy with the girlfriend. I started to loose touch with my real friends and thought they were jealous of my relationship. i was getting really paranoid.   At the end of it all i broke up with her because i failed to see she was a bloodsucking leech.  So there i was single and without friends. Lucky for me i made intelligent friends who saw what was going on and forgave me the moment i broke up. I still feel like a jerk  Love to my friends &lt;3&lt;3
I like this idea.
I was a victim of that bullshit. I'm Canadian and I happened to be in the US at the time, so I was forced to rely on NBC. I will never forget.
Two guys leaving for lunch, same elevator: "Wanna grab some lunch?" "Maybe. I figured I'd go to the range and hit a bucket of balls, though." "Oh. I'm gonna get a Hustler and read it at KFC." "Oh, ok."
I just joined, here's mine:  https://www.dropbox.com/referrals/NTY2MDYxMzc5
Very nice, I once had all of these questions...
MONOCLE IS MONTHLY YOU DUMB BROAD!
perhaps it had something to do with having been playing it all day, and into the night, then getting to that stage and one of those ape fuckers leaping through a hole in the ceiling, at which point every single crack or hole in the wall could potentially make me shit myself again
You should put "The Fall of the Internet" in the middle above the girls head in the same font as the other words.
hmmm, how was work today Jeff?
Phoenix + Zealots. Shoot down the running away banshees + lift certain marauders to make the job easier for the Zealots. You should be able to push back and win if he spent that much resources getting them early on.
Flawless upgrade, this haven't happen for a few versions. It also feels snappier. Fantastic job.  I'll hold my judgement on the windows buttons on the left but for now I feel like a fish out of water.
Obsess over him until it becomes unhealthy. Oops, this isn't shitty advice.
Luckily Reddit didn't even exist back then otherwise ShaiGuy may have made the same post and then we would have all sorts of conspiracy theorists going nuts over the flash videos showing random peoples standing away with both thumbs up while the towers collapsed. 
LOL.  Actually my wife greatly resembles Ricci, forehead and all.  I think it is kinda cute. I did like Worf in ST:TNG, but never thought of it as being sexual...
Becks
The Incredible Machine. 
That's good to know.  I've been sick of having to get three of those to craft them.
SHH!  We do not talk about Usenet.
Do not allow pan to cool!  You want a nice hot pan to give your cornbread a delicious, crispy crust.
What could have to do with that?
Man, that is just epic!
Distance and angle affect amount/density of smoke. Ive found hitting a flat surface thats facing up (land and bldg roofs) is the most effective. 
Exactly. It's much different when everyone around you tells you it's true. Life long atheists went through a phase of believing every word their parents said. It's much harder having to brush off years of indoctrination than to grow up without having to challenge the way you saw the world around you.
So you're saying that right here, right now, you'd trade their justice system for ours without hesitation? 
Only pussies used blue phantoms.
hurrrr
Didn't we accidentally bomb a Chinese embassy during the invasion of Iraq?
dying for a shithole like the USA is pointless
That's the same A that is in pause. Unless you're pronouncing pause differently.
Ha ha!  The Onion always cracks me up!
This actually happened to me as well, twice.  Once in seventh grade everyone was dead silent, working on writing stories during English class. I had to fart really bad and thought I could sneak out a silent one. I tried to let it out slowly, but to no avail. It all came rushing out at once in one magnificent, thunderous blast that cut the silence like a knife. It was loud enough that everyone in the room turned at toward me at once. At first I tried to play it off but I knew everyone knew the source, so I tried to sputter something that was vaguely coherent and just ended with "...yeah, I got nothing."  The second time was even better. I went to a private Catholic high school that required all seniors to go on a religious retreat. I was not exactly enthusiastic as I was already beginning to embrace the atheist that I openly profess to be now. Anyway, during the last day of the retreat I had eaten an entire box of frosted mini-wheats as a snack and the fiber was doing a number on me. We were all gathered in a smallish room listening to a sermon one of the brothers was giving and he told us to all bow our heads for a silent prayer. Right in the middle of that silent time I let rip another glorious, room rocking fart. I couldn't help myself but to just giggle and say sorry.
Get her "the easy way to quit smoking" by allen carr. The book is truly amazing. I've heard something like a 95% success rate and I believe it.
I was using mojosam's definition of open to rebute moghua's assertion that the internet couldn't have developed on such a definition of open.  Call it what you will, my real point is that it was good enough for the internet to grow out of.  The internet can live without any of those technologies.  But it didn't.  My point was that the fact that they were patent encumbered didn't prevent their adoption and widespread use in the internet of the 80s and 90s.
get wasted
Hey don't bring guns into this. In a free country responsible people should be able to own guns. I can't understand why the left leaning side of the spectrum is so anti gun. I'm a pretty liberal son of a bitch and I support gun rights. 
There are plenty of exercises for strength that do not require any equipment, some have already been mentioned.  Sit ups, air bikes, and variations of leg lifts for the abs; Push ups for the chest and arms; Wall sits and squats for the legs.
&gt; I've seen things you people wouldn't believe. Attack ships on fire off the shoulder of Orion. I watched C-beams glitter in the dark near the Tannhauser gate. All those moments will be lost in time, like ... tears in rain. Time to die.  FTFY.
Shit, I...eat cardboard smelling like cologne? 
'Cheaper'?
Thanks! Well that does look like you can still sleep at night, it's more the daytime loitering they're trying to stop. No bay to breakers viewing parties anymore I guess haha.
What does dog taste like?
Think of all the robot assisted sex positions.
I'm sure it's somewhere in there.
savescum!
Plants don't have nerve endings. Plants can't experience pain.   Edit: Downvoted for stating a fact? AWESOME. 
True Peace begins upon recognition that ALL of Jerusalem is Israel's Sovereign capital city!!
A) I dont think Im hot shit.  Im confident, but it stops there.  B) I NEVER, EVER belittle her.  I never say anything negative about her size/weight.  I constantly tell her she's pretty and that I love her.  Beyond that, I try to make sure I SHOW her I care about her.  C) What is trolling??  I seriously dont know what that means.  Someone educate me on that one.  D) I am being very honest and open.  Im looking for answers here; solutions to what I feel is a problem in my relationship.
If your eyes don't get moist from reading this you are not alive.
Post questions to a social news aggregate site and revel in the similarity of thought to my own.
This is why dogs are better than cats.
... of some things; and not of others.
that "depends." (Hint: google astronaut and diaper.)
I like [this](http://live.xbox.com/en-US/profile/profile.aspx?pp=0&amp;GamerTag=WookieeFart) one better.  LOL
Ok, now I know you're a troll. Good day =)
when I hear it, my mind finishes with 'l-o-l-a' and next thing I know I'm singing.
And I want it.
Might be imitating and appropriating, but how'd he get to the source material?
&gt;No, but frukt seemed to feel the law banning veils was justifiable because it had been democratically selected.  Let's substitute a few words:  "No, but Testamint seemed to feel the law enforcing the veils was justifiable because it had been democratically selected."  See the problem?  The veil is a product of a foreign law.  That law is called Sharia law.  The culture that gave rise to the Sharia law believes that women are men's chattel, and believes that it's a woman's responsibility to keep men from being aroused.  Therefore women must dress modestly according to Sharia law.  And if a woman wants to be *indisputably* modest, she then must cover all of herself.  Hence the veil.  This kind of Sharia bullshit is utterly antithetical to Western values.  It is completely incompatible.  So here you have two cultures with two laws:  Islamic culture with Sharia law and Western culture with our secular laws.  They are *not compatible*.  They are both a product of democracy (I'm being unbelievably charitable toward Islam here, because Islamic cultures tend to be brutal and undemocratic, but let's say the way they came around was democratic).  Which democracy will you side with?  Foreign-to-Belgium democracy and its products like the veil?  Or the native Belgium democracy?  And if you agree that a popular decision is not always moral, then you must agree that the veil and what it represents in an Islamic context is highly immoral.  So if you can ignore the popularity contest, why aren't you bashing the veil harder?  You seem very biased.
Why are they asking the fucking weatherman for his opinion?  Anyway, besides using many illogical points, there is one idea there that is valid.  &gt;The researchers would take a single child out of the classroom for a nonverbal IQ test consisting of a series of puzzles -- puzzles easy enough that all the children would do fairly well. Once the child finished the test, the researchers told each student his score, then gave him a single line of praise. Randomly divided into groups, some were praised for their intelligence. They were told, "You must be smart at this." Other students were praised for their effort: "You must have worked really hard." ...  &gt;Then the students were given a choice of test for the second round. One choice was a test that would be more difficult than the first, but the researchers told the kids that they'd learn a lot from attempting the puzzles. The other choice, Dweck's team explained, was an easy test, just like the first. Of those praised for their effort, 90 percent chose the harder set of puzzles. Of those praised for their intelligence, a majority chose the easy test. The "smart" kids took the cop-out. Why did this happen? "When we praise children for their intelligence," Dweck wrote in her study summary, "we tell them that this is the name of the game: Look smart, don't risk making mistakes." And that's what the fifth-graders had done: They'd chosen to look smart and avoid the risk of being embarrassed.   [From a Carol Dweck Study](http://blogs.chron.com/schoolzone/2007/02/stop_telling_your_kids_theyre_1.html)  [Carol Dweck - Wikipedia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Carol_Dweck)
beret of poodle, on my noodle. It shall rest, 
With what energy input? And compared to what current figures?
Clutch is working perfectly in all other gears.  Just replaced the motor mount about a month ago.  I wouldn't even begin to know where to look to check trans fluid. I'll have a buddy do that for me.  Trans never pops out of gear.  Sounds like your #4 is my most likely culprit. Thanks for the info.
Too late....sorry to disappoint....
Gas companies raise prices whenever they fucking feel like it.  Remember our fake oil crisis, after W launched the war in Iraq? Gas went up to over $5/gallon out here in California.  There was no restriction on supply or production anywhere in the world;  we haven't used *any* Iraqi petroleum since the 1990s at the latest. There was no crisis; *there wasn't even a shortage.*  But the petroleum conglomerates knew you didn't know that. Even better for them, they knew even if you did know about their scam,  they could *still* charge you whatever they wanted per gallon. They raised the price because they *knew they could* and even better for them, they *knew* the oilmen in the White House *wouldn't raise a finger to rein them in.*  You'll notice that in the quarter after $5/gallon "crisis," Exxon/Mobil posted the HIGHEST CORPORATE PROFIT *EVER* REPORTED IN THE HISTORY OF EARTH: $36 billion dollars. *Pure profit, one financial quarter.*  Americans REALLY need to pay attention to the political parties they favor.  Obama cut taxes for those making under $250,000/yr., and the loonies go into the street believing that he raised their taxes.  Exxon/Mobil *stole* hundreds, maybe thousands, out of the pocket of *every single driver* in America, and from every single non-driver too, as the trucking companies had to suddenly pay a 150% increase for fuel. But no one cares about that. No one's out in the street waving stupid misspelled signs screaming about that crime.  Before you vote, always ask yourself:  who *truly* represents *MY* interests? (ProTip: it ain't the Party that the petroleum corporations favor.)
Hey, whatever happened with the modeling thing, did you win?!
That lady is bat-shit crazy
&gt;Who would be willing to adopt a deaf chinchilla?   Funniest thing I read all day for some reason.
[](/wat)
25 *is* the year, your car insurance rates drop.
volunteer at a pet shelter to play with the kitties and walk the dogs
I read the book.  Self confidence, openness in new situations, and reactiveness to people in general will get you far.   Understanding people and learning to manipulate them will (like it or not) get you farther.   That book is a good tool, Carnegie knew his stuff.
That's brilliant. To the original poster: your parents love you, and when you leave their home they will miss you like nothing else. First of all, the fact that they didn't kick you out immediately shows they're not (completely) inhumane. Second of all, everything will seem different once they haven't seen you in months. They may never join PFLAG or lobby for gay marriage, but I think it's reasonable to expect that they will be wanting you back in their lives eventually.
Both.  I'm supporting my parents now, b/c of their mistakes with money.
Yes, the corporate overloads have trained you well, young consumerwan.
Not even close to true.  We've purchased our last 3 dogs from very responsible breeders, and we picked each dog out after it was born.  I think you are arbitrarily applying the term responsible.  It doesn't matter if the breeder is showing their dog if they are being bred to go to loving family homes.  One of the dogs came from a breeder that had very successful show dogs, while the other two came from breeders that were looking for loving families and nothing more.  Certainly top breeders may often have waiting lists, but not all responsible breeders.  That is simply ridiculous and pisses me off a bit as our dogs have come from wonderful places.  I do appreciate your concern earlier about the specific breed though.
It's in HD. Spanning the camera to both and leaving it there would work oh so fine.
thephotoman: the world needs more people like you.  try and pick up the sarcasm there if you can.
Why the hell is this in a mainstream newspaper? Don't they have anything important to report?
Thanks!
Ice cubes that taste like farts smell.  I know,  I know,  Crazy.
Unfortunately no. The world doesn't need any more of those types of people.
That's because they made the people blue....
Muse.  I find the lyrics are astoundingly mediocre and the music nothing special.  Even songs like Citizen Erased (which Muse fans often jizz over while condemning the newer albums) sound like a mix between old Linkin Park instrumentation with cheesy synth arpeggiations thrown in.  Some brilliance shines through occasionally, but they often ruin their own songs for me.  And Matt should stop taking huge breaths into the mic.  It's annoying.
Cool!   how many ppl. did he kill?
I'm not getting the point you're trying to make here.  Could you please explain further?
It happens because there are no other targets for social malcontents to attack in such a rigidly authoritarian society as China. They obviously can't attack the government, which is impervious, arbitrary, unaccountable, and punishes all forms of protest. 
The higher quality version was made by someone filming the tv? Really?
NO, I HAVE A SOUL!
+10 Father points
looked at them, in the words of Sawyer: SON OF A BITCH!
Wow. A blend of the two ways... where are you from?
Like Jon Stewart says, It's okay to do shit as long as they agree with what they want. If not, it's not okay. I love Jon Stewart. And P.S. All men are not endowed. And all men are not created equal. Just ask any woman or gay man.
Me me meee I used to pretend to be Davros from Dr Who....  Crush, kill deeeestroyyyyyyyyyyyyyy!  Magic!
True, but I was talking purely about genetic code.  And there are limiting factors on your three billion base pairs:  In practice, only about 1% of that information actually varies from human to human, and there's lots of combinations which wouldn't actually produce a viable human lifeform - some would be so riddled with congenital defects that they would never see their first birthday.  Then there's the factors of geography and cultural limits: You're unlikely to see the offspring of an Inuit Eskimo and an Australian Aboriginal, for instance.  Given those restrictions, the probability of a code collision seems much less astronomical, especially since it's the probability of *any two humans who have ever existed* matching, not the probability of any human matching another specific human.  I probably should have included a link to the [Birthday problem](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Birthday_problem) to better illustrate the question.
The book of Job is actually one of my favorite from the Bible. Obviously I don't believe that God exists so I'm not beholden to reconcile the existence of evil. However, it appeals to me as a metaphor for human suffering in an indifferent universe.
Dude, use children, they are useless for the most part.
**0. Play vs people better than you**
Its so bad
Those Charr near the bottom look so f'ing badass. So do the dragons and the God-realms.
Actually, on a centimeter square pack of silicon.
To be honest I don't like ComHem at all. The times I had to deal with their costumer support they have been really bad.  Great video though.
Im so, so sorry. Tell them to bring more caps for me to asplode next time : D
Let's do an experiment.  Instead of you sitting here writing on Reddit thinking that airlines would allow guns why don't you do this.  Write the airlines.  Ask them if they would allow citizens to carry guns on their flights.  You get one of them to say yes and you have something to work with. But you're not going to write them.  You're not going to do it for a couple of reasons.  One is it might take to much effort.  Another is you don't want the answer.  The answer will be no.  Actually it will be "hell no".  And if you get that answer it will fuck up your argument.  Because right now you have your boogy man.  It's the government taking away your rights.  But if you are told by the airlines that they won't do it either way then you can't blame the government anymore.  And you need that.  And then go ask around.  Go to the mall or something.  Ask people if that's what they want.  But you already know the answer to that one too.  Or how about this?  Why don't you learn to fly and buy your own plane and fly people around and let them bring their guns.  Isn't that the libertarian way?  If one business doesn't let you do something and you start a competing business that allows it you should succeed.   There you go.  So now you have two things to do.  Write some letters.  And learn to fly and start your own airline.
Now I feel like I should become a Dad.
A pew jugs to perk bout.
YEEEAAAAAHHHHHH!
unzip isn't anywhere near a 1:1 function, though.
I was a little mixed on this episode.  While it was a bit boring at parts, i must admit that the opening, of Walter smoking a bong, was my favorite opening so far.   The music was a little strange, but I thought Dunham and Broyles both sang surprisingly well.   I just can't wait for next week when we get back to the main story!  
[They're just collecting empirical data.](http://www.oneplusyou.com/bb/fight5)
HelixLauncher2 installed from the market.
Considering different parts of America have different accents, what type are you referring to?
My understanding is that Kanata, just outside of Ottawa, is the Silicon Valley North you are looking for.  There are major differences in taxation from province to province, but there are also differences in other costs of living like insurance.  In Saskatchewan for instance we have a 5% Provincial Sales Tax, and government monopolized vehicle insurance that is among the lowest priced in the country.  That would be a good thing, if they didn't fail to pay most claims, or otherwise try to hose anyone who has a claim.  I ended up not getting paid when a drunk with a stolen car crashed into my fence because SGI said the car was stolen, but according to the police the car was never reported stolen.  Apparently my fence jumped out in front of the car.  Anyway, make sure you take into account as many of the costs of living that will affect you in your situation as possible.  Good luck, and welcome home eh?
Well, it appears they used too much bleach.  
This is just a start, eventually we'll get most if not all the common questions and misconceptions up there.
GIRL POSTING OWN PHOTO ON REDDIT BRING ON THE UPVOTES
&gt; The rationals aren't well-ordered either  Sure they are, just not with respect to the standard "less-than" ordering.
why the hell would you ever use photobucket?  imgur is king.
you must do your operations in both sides of the equality. So if you add 5 in one side you must add 5 in the other.  That's useful to transfer things from one part of the equation to the other.  4x+5 = 2 --&gt; 4x+5-5=2+5 --&gt; 4x=7
Where you been at?  It was like the worst thing that's ever happened in Australia.
Give her a cleveland steamer, and BAM--chocolate milk.
Related: http://www.reddit.com/r/photography/comments/bfa34/hey_put_down_your_goddamn_camera/  Been there, done that, wised up.
Vaze
Girls, please pay attention to the fact that this is how you get sexy.
I've got quite a few graphic novels. 
download speed is horrible. seeedseeedseeed
b34ns.
amphetamines manufactured using anhydrous ammonia maybe?
So since these come in bars, does that mean you melt it? Is that difficult?
Yay for Capitalism!
selena gomez after puberty :)
Your local sex positive community center doesn't have a library?
What the backers of this proposal seem to miss is that people here (and working) illegally often have no problem providing 'documentation'.  The problem is that sometimes dozens of people will use the same documentation so it really doesn't do anything. A national ID card, even with fingerprints/whatever will be of absolutely no help in solving the problems that they assume to target with this proposal.
the maximum of each type 2$ = 50a 1$ = 100b 0.25 = 400c 0.1 = 1000d 0.05 = 2000e 0.01 = 10000f it would be all the possible combinations of a+b+c+d+e+f = 100 subject to the constraints that those letters can not exceed those numbers.
The [original image](http://fc05.deviantart.com/fs8/f/2006/350/3/1/Une_Histoire_de_Soleil_Levant_by_clasixart.jpg) looked better before it was changed to blue
We do have IQ tests, but [Eysenck](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hans_Eysenck), their originator, was highly controversial on the issue of race, and there are [arguments still](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Race_and_intelligence), of possible bias inherent in the results or the testing model.  More importantly, though, the issue of ‘race’ isn’t as simple as a birth map against a Pantone chart. Our genetic history is far more intertwined than physical types, and modern cultural and social groups reflect.  tl:dr; &gt;Do you accept that some ethnic groups may be, on average, more intelligent than others?  No.
No.
Hmm, okay. That makes sense, thank you so much! I don't know why my teacher this year didn't actually teach us this stuff. &gt;&lt;
Weird. Earlier today the phrase 'I steal all my solos from the Rolling Stones' popped into my head completely unbidden. That's from a different song, but still. I don't think I had heard or thought of the Dayglo Abortions in about 20 years.
I just think I have something to offer on the subject. It really is working for me[1].   As for assholes, girls can't fool me. I know what they keep up there.   [1] The other week, at the supermarket, a celebrity (you know her name, or, if not, definitely her sister's) was irked I wasn't paying attention to her. It wasn't the "trick" where a guy ignores a girl to get her interest, it was all natural. That made me think I was on the right track.
San Francisco Bay area. 
May you listen to his vinyls in peace.
Ah, crap.
you mean praying doesnt cure gallstones?
Where's stickers and sleepovers!?!
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=66ibuZKVdEc
I do, too! And I cross my Z's so they don't get confused with the numeral 2.
yea, it's called a realdoll.
Well he is a nine hundred year old time travelling alien, and has different priorities.
Masturbate violently. 
They probably don't enjoy smelling 'nice' and much rather go roll around in a decaying squirrel. But I wouldn't call it animal cruelty.   
What color crayons is it going to come with?
Started with suppressing fire, took cover behind containers. Moved in along the side, took 6 pirates into custody through a broken window. Heard voices from the aft, and arrested another two. All eight were unarmed. One more was ordered down from the floor above. They cleared out the bridge with three men and searched the apartments to find them ransacked (laptops thrown across the floor and many rooms shot up). They found many weapons, including RPGs. The German crew had locked themselves into a saferoom and were very relieved to be liberated by the Dutch.  Nothing was said of the devastation to the bridge; I understood this to be from the suppressing fire. At the beginning of the video, the narrator mentions that the team knew the crew was in a saferoom.
Fallout 3 is a really fun game. i recommend the GOTY edition, it adds 20 hours of playtime easily.
If you had watched any season of Deadliest Catch, you could probably see it coming.  Every episode was like watching Phil kill himself with cigs, Red Bull, and stress.
Belkin 1250VA UPS Battery Backup   The 1250VA Dual Form Factor Small Enterprise UPS from Belkin provides more value for your money. In addition to enhanced connectivity options, more network protection ports, and more telephone protection ports, this feature-packed UPS unit offers eight battery-protected outlets.
You need to submit this in ffffuuuuu. This place is dead.
vs Frash
I grew up in Wisconsin and just moved back because of stories like these. God Bless us.
If you are looking to make as much money as possible you need to apply to private schools. If you are looking for as much vacation time as possible you need to apply to the public schools.  To be honest, working for the public system required jumping through too many hoops. I also like the working schedule of the private system. You start in the late afternoon and finish up late evening. However, the drawback of the private system is that there is very little vacation time. If you only plan on doing it for a year, going without much vacation time isn't a big deal, but in the long-term you might want to go with the public system.   As far as programs go my advice would be to forget about recruiters. I used a recruiter my first time around, and the second time around they were absolutely no help. When I applied to schools directly I received a more favourable response. I'm assuming it's because if they hire you they don't have to pay a recruiter a fee. I applied directly to a school and negotiated on my own. I would do the research to see what the industry standards are before taking on this task. Good luck! If you have any more questions you can send me a PM.
What poor bastards?  They make a mint out of it, don't worry. Their theme park must be full right now.
OK, I understand and your right but think of OTHER big-time criminals like Bush and company. In the end, I buy your point: corrupt (legally or ethically) officials to whom we entrust the affairs of our nation, are among the worst of criminals.
i took my wife to vegas in early january for CES. she let me hit it once lol... she recently left me :(   i probably won't be hitting anything for a long time to come... if ever again.
How deep is the stack of [unreleased photos](http://www.reddit.com/r/history/comments/8psfc/rare_never_before_seen_photos_of_hitler_evil/) that they spit out piecemeal? I guess they can't publish all of them in one go or else we wouldn't check out life.com or their magazine in the future.  My guess is that there are a couple generations' worth of Hitler just sitting in a time-release gelcap in the Life vault.
8 Dollars for my working iphone. Such a deal.
Then why don't they test the drug on people like your father, who have already lost their hearing? Even if chinchilla ears are similar to ours, they are not identical.
Good for them . I just think this headline is kinda stupid. How do you pitch your product to an open source company? Give it to them for free. Woohoo, BFD.
"So should we boycott all drugs which came about as a result of animal testing?"  No I think we should utilize the knowledge that we already have but discontinue our current forms of animal experimentation. To me torturing animals in the pursuit of knowledge is not acceptable. Here is an example of what I am talking about.   The Nazis experimented on the Jews and made many medical discoveries that have saved countless lives. Does that mean that it was ethical of them to perform those horrific experiments? Should we continue these types of experiments? I think not. Should we disregard all of the knowledge that was gained from those experiments? No. So what is my point? We should use the knowledge that we have already obtained but abstain from those barbaric practices in the future. If there are no other methods available for scientific inquiry other than painful animal testing (I am OK with animal testing as long as no one gets hurt or killed) I think we should wait until there is.  
I'd recommend laser removal. More permanent.
Well we had a drama queen in the office, who had just been dumped by her boyfriend.  We knew she was going out with a bunch of girl friends after work, so we put the dong in her backseat (note to peeps out there, don't leave your car unlocked with sneaky people about). One of her friends found it that evening as was like "You really do need a man...a big one by the looks of it".  She was embarrassed at the time, but took it in good spirits. 
I don't really like Flash either, but its success should be decided by consumers, as it was with RealPlayer.  Giving Apple a pass on using its control of the platform to arbitrarily kill off Flash is a bad precedent.  Today it is Flash, tomorrow it might be something you actually do care about.  Already Jobs [has started talking about going after some open source projects](http://hugoroy.eu/jobs-os.php).
Actually, I'm all for taking people off life support, too.  And if we want to nit-pick, the baby is reliant on any human being willing to care for it at the time, not just its mother.
He does know how to hunt and fish. And track. And trap. He always has a backup plan of scavenging or gathering what he can to eat if he doesn't catch anything.  It doesn't happen every episode. But even if it did, it wouldn't be as tiresome as watching someone take an animal he doesn't need to.  Like reality, it doesn't always work out and you have to do what you can.  That's the point- *surviving* with what you've got, on what you can find, for as long as you can.
By the time we're done, we both are kind of stumbly as we get up to take a shower or get dressed, lol.
how is that a pun? net sounds nothing like dead.
ah, we all have to walk down that road at one time or another...
I love Haunted. One of my favorite books.
Nope. I have a Herman Miller Aeron chair at both office *and* work.
Confused.
Exactly. I would describe it as total and utter openness.  I'm not claiming that's better, just different.  There's something so wonderful about being able to truly and fully share yourself with your partner to the deepest level.  That is what trust and intimacy are made of.  Plus, I think that dishonesty just plain demonstrates that you do not really have respect for your partner and I base my relationship on mutual respect.  It all depends on what's important to you, it really does.  People are different and they relate in different ways.
I shouldn't have to maximize the window to log in. At least make let me scroll down the pop-up.
http://www.cooks.com/rec/search/0,1-0,electric_skillet_cooking,FF.html ideas for electric skillet meals.  
There are plenty of middle class jobs that people with financial backgrounds can take. There are more service industries out there than most people realize. A lot of them can also be brought into smaller regional companies as hired guns from New York. It happens every time Wall Street crashes. Investment bankers find shelter making 300k a year as consultants for the financial branches of other companies. Tech companies that make computing supplies for offices have massive leasing branches that can sustain a slightly diminished Wall St. salary.
Has she considered trying the one device the pharmaceutical and tobacco industry is shit scared of? - the electronic cigarette. I've been off cigarettes two years with it. In fact I prefer them to regular cigarettes. It replicates the act of smoking better as any NRT out there. Unfortunately there's a million and one spammers out there trying to flog them often at extremely inflated prices, so you must do some research first. There are lots of models and liquids and some better than others. Some of them are a bit fiddly too. Luckily there's a couple of good forums with tons of information (and lots of fanboi squabbling) and and a subreddit : [r/electronic_cigarette](http://www.reddit.com/r/electronic_cigarette)  if you need assistance.
You're a dingleberry hanging on the ass hairs of society.
it's a story posted friday about sexual harassment on a st. louis campus.
This is terrible!!  Poor [*Insert username here*]  Give generously.
Pam: It’s whom when it’s the object of the sentence and who when it’s the subject.  Phyllis: That sounds right.  Michael: Well it sounds right but is it?  Stanley: How did Ryan use it, as an object?  Ryan: As an object…  Kelly: Ryan used me as an object.
&gt;There is not a chance in hell they would stop at the property line and let a fleeing suspect go  Except of course in this case that property line also happens to be something closer to a border, the police had no jurisdiction whatsoever.  Comically Chinese security could presumably have reacted and detained (or shot...) the police officers in this case had it been warranted.   In short they should have been aware that the consulate existed and where their jurisdiction ended.
Weird Science
Note to self: Make sure eel had a good meal prior to inserting into bowels.
I put everything in sandwiches. Seriously, everything. I've had steak and chips in a sandwich. I've had strawberry pie in a sandwich. I've put a sandwich in a sandwich (though that was a joke).
Welp, I've already eliminated option A but that one sucked anyway. 
I call weed and energy drinks the poor man's speedball.
sleepyj910 seemed like he/she was making light of the potential view points of the individual in the article that stated women who are not married are destined to be prostitutes.
English, mother-fucker, do you speak it?  What?
Just remember that in some states, if you get ticketed for pissing in public, you have to register as a sex offender. Or if you're an 18yo girl who consensually fucks her 17yo boyfriend (or just sends him a semi-nude cell phone pic) ... Or if you're an old lady who takes pictures of her grandchildren in the tub ... Sex offender. For life. Grossly limited freedoms at best, prison sentence at worst. But thankfully we can still dress up little girls as whores and make them suggestively dance for our entertainment. Why? Because FAT, WHITE, HYPOCRITICAL, RURAL, PERVERTED BAPTIST ASSHOLES HEGEMONICALLY CONTROL THIS COUNTRY.
He was discussed in this week's [This American Life](http://www.thisamericanlife.org) about his "experience" as a teacher at high school in East San Jose. His segment starts at about 6-7 minutes in. It's maddening.
jQuery in 10 seconds of thought:  $(function(){   setTimeout("init",2000);  });  function init(){   var imgurl = "http://imgurl.com/image.jpg";   $("body").append('&lt;img src="' + imgurl + '" /&gt;');  }    
I got it from the Wiki article [here](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rape_in_the_United_States).
He looks a bit like Seinfeld.
&gt;(and aside from physical characteristics, they are mostly just vague stereotypes)  You lost any credibility you may have had with me when you said that. I've been around dogs my whole life of all sorts of various breeds, my mom trained dogs and I have had several friends who were trainers. So in addition to all the research I've done for my own dog, I've had a lot of first hand experience.  Breed is a VERY important factor. Huskies for example need a lot of exercise, that's not an opinion, it's not a "stereotype", it's a firm hard fact. They have been breed to run and that also means they have a ton of energy which means they can be very destructive to your house if you aren't prepared for it.  Now let's take a look at a breed that's known for its aggression; pitbulls have had been breed to want to dominate all other dogs and they require lots of socialization with other dogs at a very early age. Where as a husky requires little to no effort at all.  This can be easily be observed by going to a dog park. Every pitbull I've seen has made an attempt to fight my dog and dominate him. Yet every time there's another wolfdog, or any spitz dog they're instantly best friends. Great danes are also very gentle and good with other dogs, even despite their size. You can't expect anyone to believe that all those pitbulls just happened to have horrible owners while all the spitz dogs had wonderful owners who socialized them early and often with other dogs.  From birth I've given my dog just as much socialization with people as I have with other dogs yet he's still very timid around strangers. He's great with other dogs and always has been. The collie I had however loved everybody and I did *zero* socialization training with that dog. I probably could have beat that dog daily and he would have still loved me and everybody he met.  Now I'm not saying it's impossible to make an aggressive dog friendly or turn a nice well adjusted family dog into a demon spawn of hell, but the amount of effort it will take depends greatly on that dog's breed.  When you sit there and tell a prospective dog owner "breed just determines looks, it's attitude is based entirely on how you raise it." you're just setting them up to fail. This is the exact type of thought process that puts dogs in the kennels in the first place. Owners get them not understanding the special needs of that breed and it ends up being more than they can handle and they dump it off at a pound.
I've had a human diplomat hanging around for awhile now. I think her caravan might have left her behind and she just stuck around. She's currently in the hospital caring for my injured mayor!
Well I was just pointing out the absurdity of "accent-less" speech. Everyone speaks with an accent.
Thank you for the thorough response.  I'm assuming it is pretty sweet of a drink due to it having a higher sugar content then most sodas/other drinks.  I guess I'll just have to make it to figure out how sweet it really is.  Tough sacrifice.
not bad!
At my grandmother's house, the only thing that will get you shooed out faster than wearing shoes inside is being black.
reddit: where people complain about celebrity news... and **lick their asses** when they acknowledge reddit exists.  hypocrisy rules
Funny, I can read the same comments and not see any shrinkage in the included set. But then, I am just a poor naive Redditor who doesn't know the difference between projects and products and whatnot.
I do say! That is not the language befitting of a gentlemen! I will have to ask you do leave my house sir!
Your unpleasant experience of living with people in that dorm.
Its not rescuing if they enjoy and take pride in their work. 
Ireland.
Okay, okay I chuckled.
I haven't used it months. Is it still relatively buggy? I know the developers wanted to move docky outside of gnome-do to try and get  it cleaned up.  Does it work well for you? It was by far my favorite dock aesthetically, but it had the habit of crashing on me :(
Problem?
Google is your friend.
that's cute
Because none of the tests for ‘measures of intelligence’ reliably predict anything outside the ability to pass the tests that they set.
lmao I did this too just hovered over them catching glimpses 
We're all just bags of meat of anyway.
This has happened twice for me. I had just thought it was based on the number of comments posted and that after a certain amount of them, they were dropped to make space. Odd.
Tango already uses a harddrive with an arrow pointing to it  [it's shown here, for lack of a better image](http://tango.freedesktop.org/images/2/20/Tango-feet.png)  (Also, curse you, windows, and your non-pasting middle mouse button)
Racist? Come on let's not go crazy.
Why are you asking the atheists?
Personally I'm a PC Guy. I'll list why.  * I feel that PC was the first to really bring the modern computer to the masses and I like to support pioneers. (I know that IBM and the like were development pioneers but I'm talking about production and marketing and constant improvement ) * apple accuses people of stealing ideas (android) but look at their ipad!  There were many tablets out long before apple showed up to play. The hypocrisy bugs me. * pricing on i products is way out of line and once the next big thing comes out, first buyers take a 200 dollar hit 2 months after a release. They don't make their products acceptable to the masses because of this.  * Steve's *I'm better than you* attitude is childish. No flash on iPhone. * iPhone app market is a pain for developers (I hear). * the whole *no viruses* thing bores me, its only because there aren't enough Mac users for the writers to waste their time, once usage goes up they will be fucked too. * ***THE CULT FOLLOWING SCARES THE SHIT OUT OF ME***  That's my brief summary. Of course you catch me on my DROID instead of work computer where typing isn't a pain in the ass.  Also, I've never owned anything besides an iPod. I know apple has done some good things but its not good enough for me to convert, or even consider it.
Wide range of external and internal modifications, bodykit 4x4. The range of the company you will find: bumpers, sills, caps on the bumper and grille, deflectors, various chrome lining of the body and much more. Wholesale and retail sale of attachments and accessories for the car.
&gt;Battle Creek, Michigan  Oh ... oh god.  I'm so sorry. ... Do you need a hug?  /Ohioan 
Darwin Award?
Word to your mother.
Oh how I do love Google Chrome.
I don't see how that's really any different than what antiproton and I posted. I was trying to agree with the both of you..
1) POS mechanics. It would be really nice if you could assign access to POSes individually and even if there were a few more user groups to assign access to than just Starbase Configure Dude, Starbase Fuel Operator, Corporation, and Alliance. If custom groups could be created and then populated, then alt-corps wouldn't need to be created within alliances just for some security-sake for enterprising individuals looking to throw up a POS but who are worried about another Starbase Configure Dude jacking their stuff. Obviously, there would be a lot of overhead involved with implementing such a system, but there has to be a better way.  2) Shares of corporations. I think that it is absurd for corporations to have to keep shares in the hands of one individual for security sake. The fact that if any amount of shares is given to more than one individual means that anyone can vote to issue more shares, give themselves those shares and then take control of the corporation if he knows that the other people with the shares are going to be away from the game for more than 24 hours is bullshit. Also, if there were separate classes of shares that would also be very nice and I don't think that it would be particularly hard to implement. There could be a class of shares that does not give any voting rights, for the purpose of dividends or anything carebearish like that (not my cup of tea, but don't see why it shouldn't be done). More relevant to our current position would be a class of shares that would be allowed to vote on anything, except for new CEOs or issuance of shares. And then of course a class of shares held by the CEO (or others) that can vote on new share issuance and CEO elections.
I know I guy who says it lohl. I think he has a brain disorder.
I suppose this all comes down to what you think the end goal is.  I'm really interested in the kind of thing you're mentioning.  The link to the Black Sheep Inn is full of really cool stuf.  But you have to admit, it is eco tourism and not a typical touring experience for people from a first world country.  It can be made close, but not quite there.  I'm not involved in the Reddit Island thing, so I don't have the best idea of what the end goal is.  Obviously what I'm talking about is a septic system that is appropriate for what someone living in a reasonably civilized area would expect that will also protect any fresh groundwater resources nearby.  Toss out either of those, and you can go hog wild in many different directions of how to handle your poop.  As far as labor = money, it depends on what you're doing.  I am in business.  I expect labor to equal money, and, even when it doesn't, you can use the reasonable value of that labor to figure out just how much you're pushing your luck with volunteers.  It's just a standard recognized metric that works.
WolframAlpha just kicks ass over google and the others when doing queries like these. Take aways from the query results:  USA per capita output: $45K and Chinese: $3k USA GDB is %225 larger than China.  Look at the graph in linear scale.
Ewwwwwww
My parents neighbours adopted a 6 year old.  Before they brought her home for good, they took classes on how to deal with integrating a new child in to the family, and she came for day visits.
Fuck. Apparently there are 4 different ways to say it:  Face - VAYSE  Pause - VAUZ  Jazz - VAHZ  Raise - VAYZ
i feel like "adopting a deaf chinchilla" could be code word for masturbating 
next time you can't make the same mistake...you can make a chiral one though...
&gt; Probable cause- a reasonable amount of suspicion, supported by circumstances sufficiently strong to justify a prudent and cautious person's belief that certain facts are probably true  I think that's a bit more than a "hunch"  Lastly how is this different than current law? What if you change only the last portion of the quote:  &gt; A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER, WITHOUT A WARRANT, MAY ARREST A PERSON IF THE OFFICER HAS PROBABLE CAUSE TO BELIEVE THAT THE PERSON HAS COMMITTED ANY PUBLIC OFFENSE THAT MAKES THE PERSON *DETAINABLE IN A U.S. JAIL/PRISON*.  Isn't this current law? I can be arrested if a police officer has probable cause to believe that I am committing or have committed a crime.  I am not trying to be argumentative, I am actually curious how this is different.
I'll probably end up helping Cycling Club out with their Bike Blender (making smoothies!).  I think it'll be near the tiger.  I'm not in the club but one of my friends is and they'll need help peddling.
I am really glad everything worked out for you in the end. Not having kids myself I can't even begin to imagine what you went through.  Edit: I worded that last sentence terribly. Thanks for sharing even though it must have been really tough to do.
I know people who say "lol." Not "lawl," but actually pronounce it like "el-oh-el." It makes me want to punch them in the neck.
Would you mind if I posted a bunch of plans on your subreddit for how to get this project going?
For the essay, just use a shitload of unnecessary and pompous vocabulary.  
Are you seriously too lazy to find the info yourself? If you believe in global warming it should be easy to find the info you require. Kids today.
when kids in english class got tired of saying "what" or "can you repeat that?" 
Depends on the humans.  For instance the guy in the cubicle next to me who insist on having teleconferences on speaker-phone.  I would mind making that totally futile for him.  He'd probably just attach an amplifier to his phone though.
Not petty if you have no other option.
lol I win.
Don't bother, you'll get down voted just like me.
this, I think generally English people pronounce it more like bars, Americans more like face
Yeah, I'm gonna go right ahead and say that it's different in Canada than it is in the states.  I'm serious. Racism is the status quo down there. Something so simple as me offering the seat next to me to a black man in the states got me a "are you freaking crazy?" look from him, and he went and sat down next to a Latina woman.  I've heard another story where the details are really fuzzy, but I just remember the story of a white guy visiting from Canada trying to interact with a black man at work on a more social level, and the black man started to get really aggressive - again, fuzzy details, but something that he was trying to offer him the guy was taking offense to, thinking it was about race - wondering WTF was wrong with him, until a (black) friend of his pulls him back, says "No man, he wasn't trying to pull anything on you. He's from Canada. It's different up there." Again, the details are really fuzzy but I remember that it's something that nobody really thinks twice about here because race generally isn't a huge issue.  Only real racism I see in Canada is limited to people being angered towards immigrants who don't know local customs and there's still a lot of racism problems towards first nations. But I see cross-race relationships all the time. I'm white and my best friend is Persian - was born in Tehran. There is still racism but it's generally considered taboo and is nowhere near the status quo. I love living in a country that defines itself as "multicultural."
Well, he was a bit eel-tempered.
There you go.  That's a new word.  good job.
I laughed so hard at this I hated myself for it.
BLOWJOB ALARM CLOCK
Except this oil is of a different composition. It has more volatile components that will evaporate. Not something I have the expertise to calculate, though.
Article is complete fluff.  1. Learn a new language 2. Start form the ground up 3. Question everything ... 14. From the very basic, create the beautiful
It's my worksafe account now!
The U.S. has porn names, U.K.'s got judge names.
Lobster, beer and a cute guy. Nice. :)
These barbaric fuckers deserve the worst, AND you can bet there are plenty of Western Christians who would behave the same way if they had the support of the state.
Okay, he's striking a silly pose and doesn't exactly look like a  killer, but wtf are those weapons?  Giant knives with wrist straps and handles, do they have a name?  I wonder if they'd actually be an effective weapon.  I have an odd suspicion that if you really got into some sort of melee you'd be better off grabbing them by the strap ends and using them like swords.
That and translations of the text.
I wouldn't know.  I gave up on home wireless routers quite some time ago.  I just hung an old desktop running pfSense off the cable modem.  Then I hung a cheap switch off of that, and a old Netgear wireless router with the DHCP turned off off of the switch.   It's kinda mickey-mouse, but it handles everything I throw at it.  There isn't a torrent made that'll knock it over.  The radio hangs in the Netgear from interference maybe twice a month, I just unplug and replug it and that takes care of it.  On the wired side, nothing ever dies.  Home routers just seem kinda underpowered and buggy to me.  They're ok for casual use, but they won't take any kind of a heavy load.  The only exception might be a Linksys WRT54G, as long as it's V4 or under, with a third-party firmware like Tomato or something. They still make the V4, only it's called WRT54GL, for (L)inux.  Avoid Version 5 and up like the plague.  They chopped the Flash ROM and RAM Memory in half.  I got stuck with one of those, and they're suitable for a paperweight and little else.  I offed it on my nephew-in-law.  Sucker.  Hehehe...
I know that. But even so, the modeling is quite impressive for some areas.
based on the description you provided, you might be screwed.  VGA is essentially an RGB input with timing, red, green, and blue lines.   DVI is digital signals.  the composite signal combines all the signal into one line, so it is fundamentally incompatible with VGA/DVI unless made compatible through a converter box. by the way, the single yellow line is called composite RCA, not component.   However, according to wikipedia, the Gamecube Model DOL-001 has a component output (3 lines - YPbPr signals / Green - Blue - Red colored cable respectively).  Build this [circuit](http://web.archive.org/web/20070303095454/http://home.att.net/~billhudson/rybyrgb.pdf) (warning - PDF hosted at archive.org) and you can convert the component to RGB, which is incidentally what the VGA on your monitor needs to see.  Total cost - probably $30 for tools, parts, materials + countless hours of your life.  But since you're a guy who posts to electronics, you'll probably learn a lot and be a better person for it.
hell, I'll downvote myself since you didn't point that out meaning it was less of him.  my point is that he's still more of badass than you will ever be and you failed to recognize that in your post.  when you read this, don't forget to just downvote me like these other jackasses.
I got that at Chi Chi's once.
Any of these. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/SF_Masterworks
I own a bunch of games via Steam. I just happened to not have it installed on this machine, at the time... .
PKD's exegesis has been published for years. [I have a copy from back in the early 90s.](http://www.amazon.com/Pursuit-Valis-Selections-Exegesis/dp/0887330932/ref=sr_1_1?ie=UTF8&amp;s=books&amp;qid=1272672592&amp;sr=8-1)  But it will be cool if the entire thing is published.
 ┌─┐  ┴─┴   ಠ_ರೃ-No, were European.   &lt;|&gt;     /`\  
[Randy on the bus.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4vwICUhGz78)  This makes me laugh...hard...every single time I see it.  
I don't have that type of money or it would have been my first choice :)
Creams are bad. Don't use them, anywhere. The best way to remove hair besides electrolysis (expensive) is waxing. It hurts at first, but it grows back MUCH slower and without the itch. Anyone serious about hair removal waxes. 
I love the underground cafe's veggie burger. Rumour has it the lesbians that run the plus bought the ultra secret recipe for $10000.
Is dhcp enabled? Have you tried using an IP instead of a hostname? 
Dark Angel.
Kind of staged.  But still nice.
Oh...   Your ignorance is showing...
Killing BuzzKillington alert: If it's worth patenting, it's worth hiring a lawyer to make sure its done right.  Patent is extremely tricky, and the last thing you want is to invent a million dollar idea because portions of your application are construed as dedicated to the public.  I wouldn't even think of patenting my own shit, and I'm a lawyer (albeit not a patent lawyer).
Obviously you don't want your work being plagiarized, but at the same time word of mouth is crucial for success. If some one tells a joke and makes their best attempt to source the comedian... I don't think you can't be upset with them. But I guess it is similar to professors and grading bibliographies; some really care about proper citation and others could care less if you put a period after the name and not a comma. So long as you don't try to pass it off as your own, or attempt to make money from using it, it's fine by my standards.
Battle of the multis.
That's irrelevant.
Totally. There was one in Alaska where he found some fishing net and even that didn't work out. 
Wow, it's the perfect Torontonian stereotype in real life.  It's to bad that the sun revolving around Toronto and the fact that your a "real city" has no effect on the quality of your hockey team. It's 3-1 Pens right now.  Is Montreal still a real city or is Vancouver the newest real city?  Forgive me, I'm unfamiliar with the time it takes to get on and off a bandwagon.  
One thing to note.  That NW blue dot is on the lower side of the ridge. if you go around the back you get to the upper side which is a better vantage point plus you can walk to the edge and cap un-suspecting wookies.  Although that area is generally for recon snipers i find.  Or CG engineers
Go to the airport. Look at the departure lists. Find a flight that looks cool. Go to the ticket counter and buy a ticket. Profit.
there's a reason it's called the idiot box.... it's run by idiots.
Damn you!
&gt; and limiting immigration of lowly skilled people?  It can't discourage immigration of "lowly skilled people". It can make it illegal, though... which just makes those people second-class (non) citizens who can be abused and exploited.  And listen to your bullshit prejudice here. "Low" and "high"?  I might need the skills of a heart surgeon someday, but I sure as hell need the skills of the man who can replace my roof or repair the toilet.
That may be, but there is no way you could resist the appeal of Narwhal Bacon.
Either combat or river raid for atari . 1979 is a bit fuzzy in my mind, I was born in 1976
I bought a G9, but my constant battles with the intrusive braid cable eventually wore it down, and the wires in the mouse were revealed. It doesn't work anymore (Not fully anyway). I reverted back to my old RX1000, not the most comfortable, but at least it isn't braided. Even if I tried to asked Logitech to repair it, not sure I would want it.
People can come up with statistics to prove anything.  14% of all people know that!
Just bought it on steam.  5$ ain't a bad price at all.
Oh, definitely French. Disregarding its use while you're here, I imagine it'd be way more useful to know once you're back home--not much people speak Dutch apart from those in Belgium and the Netherlands, after all. And I wouldn't know, but apparently Dutch grammar is a bitch to pick up, much more so than French.  Sure thing, man. Hope you have a great stay, and if you're ever in Leuven, let me know and I'll buy you a beer!
The part when everything is going smoothly.
uhh, TIL there was a $500, $1000, $10,000 bill as well.
RAMIREZ! POINT THOSE SOMALI'S TOWARDS ZIP TIES!
Hmm. Ain't much that is going to help you for the test tomorrow.  Here's your first lesson on functions.  Learning, for example, is a function of time and effort studying, and my sense is that you need at least a month of very intensive study with a good tutor to get the 500 you want.  
Oh I dunno.  Standing up sideways.  Standing up looking at the cam.  View from the back.  Wearing underwear about halfway down.  You could probably look at some other pics posted to get ideas.  There's been a "classic pose" theme some folks have tried (see mistre's last post, for example, and read comments)
Whoah. That fool was crushing it. And hella styles, too. Nice.
How old are you? How long have you been single?
[Consumerist](http://consumerist.com/2010/04/drm-ravaged-avatar-dvds-may-not-work-on-blu-ray-players.html) was on this a week ago.  The outrage has commenced.  Fuck DRM.
Interesting perspective on the failed logins and rather than that successful logins, I like it.  This is a neat idea, as they already do have ip information on who's fetching your api key and when, it would be nice if they did this for account logins (and logoffs perhaps).  I would just like some improved logistics for wormholes.  I know it's intended to be a logistics nightmare, but not ever having an opportunity to pop a freighter in a C3 or below is crazy (orcas are the main way to go &gt;:/) and getting into one is with the intention of it being a long term affair (whereas 0.0/lowsec/highsec is a fairly good transition).  I'd just like to know I don't have to be holed up in a w-space system for weeks on end with only a few people online doing stuff.  it turns off the idea of w-space if the entire corp isn't committed to just w-space.  also, crazy idea: cyno jumping orcas would be way cool.
Yup it's a clever way to start the National ID card process again. They just won't quit.
You're a hateful bigot?
I really hate to sound like a douche, but I'm going to anyway.  Why did you write "musics"? I hate when people do this in reference to classical music. It only adds to the pompous/arrogant attitude which is already tacked onto any form of classical music. It drives me nuts. The only thing I can think of that is worse than saying "classical musics" is when people fucking say "Bravissimo". No, you cunt. That is not a word anymore. Say "well done" or "hey, great performance" like everyone else, you smug asshole.
Nice try Mr. Fritzl.
Okay, okay, I've got this one. All right, so here's what we're gonna do. We're gonna turn all the elderly people (the hangers-on sucking up Social Security) into Soylent Green, then feed that to the starving, and move all of the homeless into the homes formerly occupied by the delicious elderly.  WHAM fixed everything
Clone myself a few hundred times and [invade a small country](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Tb-gI_pFog0) to call my own.
Ahh 2/5, not 4/10, ughhh
You mean a week after it was on Reason.com right?
"I imagine you'd get your ass kicked sayin' somethin' like that." --Lawrence, "Office Space."
Palin basically did the same thing when she was governor. What a hypocrite. 
are you good at skee ball???
gcc isn't uncommon, since it targets a ridiculous number of processors. There's a bunch of commercial ones too but I personally try to avoid using them.
that's one of the reasons you weren't on that jury.
Here's the [link](http://books.google.com/books?id=oqyQU8uOlIUC&amp;pg=PA159&amp;lpg=PA159&amp;dq=what+would+the+founders+do+infanticide&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=GWnoIRntF4&amp;sig=t5H9O5IA7vCh4N3lg7csgsjZbc4&amp;hl=en&amp;ei=bnHbS5LxDIbw9ASIxcxZ&amp;sa=X&amp;oi=book_result&amp;ct=result&amp;resnum=1&amp;ved=0CAYQ6AEwAA#v=onepage&amp;q&amp;f=false) to the Richard Brookhiser book about Alexander Hamilton defending infanticide.  I might be wrong, but I ain't no troll.
I spent a month alone in the woods with my brother when I was 15. One week all alone. It gets a little lonely at times, but keep busy and you wont' miss things too much. We went out with very few supplies and "survived'.
Soon there will be more.........
It depends upon context.
Yeah, but people pronounce the A differently. Spelling like that doesn't really help, you'll have to be more phonetically differentiated.  Is it VAYZE or VAHZ?
I currently work for the biggest private English school in Seoul. It's like the McDonald's of private schools. It's probably not the best education in the world, but it gets the job done, and consistently well.
Tricep Dips.  http://exercise.about.com/od/exerciseworkouts/ss/tricepexercises_4.htm
For the essay, don't bother writing 5 paragraphs. You won't finish, and if you do, it won't be very good. Stick with 4. An intro, 2 body paragraphs, and a conclusion. That way you can make a well-rounded argument without pulling stuff out of your ass.  Answering a question wrong counts 1/4 point off. I'm sure you've heard many people say not to guess on the SAT. However, that is only half of the truth. If you can eliminate *ONE* answer, statistics are on your side to guess on one of the other 4. So DO GUESS, but don't blind guess!  Take some Maalox with you or something. Halfway through my practice SAT, I started having some major... er... gastrointestinal issues. It took so much off my concentration that I ended up just having to guess through the last half. Destroyed my score. Thank god it was only a practice, but you do NOT want to get sick during the real deal!
No, not like Dubai. The government there has been very involved in planning all the extravaganza. The largest property developers there are either wholly or partly owned by the state.
Stroud will eat the tyres later on on a fire made from snow. Bike abandoned by Unbear Gyrls who [catches a cab back from the wilderness every evening.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3UpSlpvb1is)
No there is nothing wrong with your face. Just sounded right comparing it to base. b and the v. that's all.
I have not. Also I haven't used any, in any streaming capacity, so bandwidth hasn't been an issue. Theora compares well with mpeg2 (DVD), but mpeg4 levels of compression probably beat it for quality at similar levels of compression (file size).  Theora is based on vp3 from on2, if Google, who recently purchased on2, open sources vp8 hopefully it can be integrated into theora or as well.
Now back to Cuba now back to me...
shame on me for passing on myths without checking :) any links to more details?  
I guess I thought it was just a meaningless brand name. Mostly I just never thought of it.
I believe the maid was cleaning the apartment and left a window open. Kid was running around fell.
*thunderous applause*  iRoman looks less like the   Asshole that he is.
It could be worse...you could be gay, kicked out of home and dying http://takumisheart.com/Takumis_Heart/home.html  But good luck mate. This isn't going to be easy but I hope it turns out to be a fresh start from you and you can begin to make your own way in life. Don't let it kill off your strength and enthusiasm. Challenges like this can be appreciated in a few years time when you can look back and go fuck yeah I did that! Best wishes
Thanks.. I'm reading about daytrading right now.
Not really sure, it's a picture of a highfive palm outline. Might be the forum.  ...I'm lying, it's goatse.
Robots and turtles, right?
wow. demented and horny.
I fully agree, bicyclists should be obeying the same rules as motorists. Another thing I would like to see more is more people wearing helmets.
i also considered this... but Im concerned my bum would bleed from the hair being ripped out.
something something something daaaark sidee....
Yes, but how can they take their shoes off when it's so dirty? That stuff is just not going to work!
I've got s shiny Tentacool too. I didn't nickname it but I did evolve it into Tentacruel.
a lot of common isopropyl alcohol is still 30% water.  Something with less than 10% water is pretty hard to find, nevermind the 99% pure isopropyl stuff. Its a good cleaner because it cleans itself up as well, evaporating without leaving any residues that could be damaging to electronics, unlike most other cleaning chemicals. Because of its water content you should still keep it away from any powered-up electronics and make sure whatever you cleaned is dry before powering it back up
This times a thousand. OR you can try shrooms with Nutella.  I watched the Big Lebowski on mushrooms and I've never done anything better in my entire life. you actually see yourself as the Dude.
Baroness ... hands down... great band (even if I would have found them months later anyway since they are getting the respect the deserve)
Mundo is DPS. He's just difficult to kill due to his ult. It's like saying Poppy is a tank - she's clearly meant to do DPS, she just has skills that make downing her quite the task.
Patience, young padwan. Things come in due time.
The SAT isn't the most important part of your transcript and you can always retake the test. Be zen.
The Bill of Rights is not extended to everyone.  If it were, foreigners would be allowed to walk around carrying automatic rifles - which is covered by the Second Amendment.   Then again, I'm not sure you even know what you're talking about because the Bill of Rights didn't exist at the time the Declaration of Independence was written.
* change your username to pdub * beg on reddit, digg, etc * rent a yacht and cruise around the caribbean
Being fucked by bears. What's worse than that?
FRANK ZAPPA!
I think it's 7-1-1, actually, since you can never reduce the damage of an attack below 1.  Still extremely effective.
Good thread... srsly.  also, B
It's a nicely designed logo, though I wonder if it's:  a. designed as the result of a real world client brief  b. designed as a logo for logo's sake   extremely impressed if answer is a. 
r/DoesAnybodyElse/
Thanks but that's not the one I was thinking of. This one is garlicky and brown without chilis (maybe just a pinch).
I've got a Logitech MX700 mouse that I bought a little under [6 1/2 years ago](http://i.imgur.com/MndK8.png). I have used it almost every day since I received it and [still use it to this day](http://imgur.com/JF0hb.jpg). I LOVE it, the paint is coming off of it, the feet are all but gone... but I just can't seem to find anything to replace it that has the same weight/feel. Unfortunately, for the last few months, the batteries have been going dead on it. Before you ask, yes, I am still using the same rechargeable batteries that came with it! I can't seem to find any batteries that fit the specs of the stock ones online... they all are rated too high! I think the rechargeable batteries of the 2003 era were just a bit weaker than today's batteries. Any ideas?  Oh yeah... not that it's under warranty, but I'm in the states... Kentucky. I feel like that guy with the Toyota that just passed up 500,000 miles and can't let his baby go. I actually have the keyboard that goes with this thing, but it has seen it's last leg a year or two ago. Every now and then, I will pull it out of the closet, hook it up and it will work... then it will die on me after a day or (2).  **TLDR;** I've got a 6 1/2 year old MX700 wireless mouse with the OEM rechargeable batteries, but now the batteries are going dead really quickly and I can't seem to find any replacements!
His girlfriend can offer him things that you simply cannot. You should respect that and not bitch about it.  You should still consider him your friend, he's just working to build a relationship with a significant other and that requires time.  Get on with your life, find a girl of your own and be available to him if shit goes bad with his girl and he calls you for advice or something.  It's not the end of the world man.
You deserve a reddit star:  *
Look at that subtle off-white coloring. The tasteful thickness of it. Oh my God, it even has a watermark.
You can just use T-Mobile's Even More Plus which is $60 a month for 500 mins, unlim text/web, no contract -- until you can get your credit fixed.
I value my integrity higher than my grades. I'd bang it out in 3-4 hours, then still explain that you never sent it, and ask if there is any chance that he'd give you a break.  You can explain the reason but don't cite your honesty as a reason for giving you a break.
As I said it was a pejorative usage of the word police, but if it's a criminal matter as nearly everyone agrees it is, then Apple shouldn't be contacting the man who sold the phone to Gizmodo, and if it was the engineer that lost it, apart from the fact that I don't see how he found the guy's information, especially after the phone went public, then he shouldn't have claimed to represent Apple, he should have said that it was his phone. I think it was the former though, because the timeline wouldn't match otherwise. The name of the finder only seems to have come out recently, not before the phone went to Gizmodo.
This thing has generated papers that have been accepted to conferences: [SCIgen - An Automatic CS Paper Generator](http://pdos.csail.mit.edu/scigen/). That's all the evidence you need.
You want to give non US citizens the right to vote here?  The US Constitution is for US citizens, not every citizen in the world.  If you think your government should be bound by a constitution like ours, and that's what a constitution is for, btw, then get one!   Or become a US citizen yourself. 
F.E.A.R. Doom 3 also had some moments.
2:09 - 2:10 was of great interest to me.   Also, Lt. Daniels? 
Thanks, I've been keeping track of edits to make and will do them all in one go.
Fallout actually wasn't open-ended until enough people complained so they added a patch that let it be open-ended. I wasn't as thrilled with the game as I was with Oblivion and Morrowind. Have you played Oblivion? I think it's better than FO3, personally.
I think he's supposed to be lying down
I would want to know, simply because the situation will not be resolved (whichever resolution that ends up becoming) without honesty in something that major. If it can be worked out, great. If not, best to end it sooner rather than later.
I had a roommate in the dorm that had zero other friends.  She would cheer (with her hands in the air) when I would come home from class/parties/dates.  It was weird.  She loved South Park though, so at least there was that.
Set it up in the passenger seat of the car, facing out.  Also, set it up in the front window of your house.  Got kids?  Put it in their closets.
I coincidentally just discovered the existence of HDR today, and decided I like it.  These are beautiful, and I particularly like the last one.
If they didn't, then it would be man's fault. We can't have that, no no no.
[You know it](http://www.steakandbjday.com/t)
holy shit i'm so stoned.
Oh damn, I wasn't even thinking.  You may post me to the nerd wall of shame.
Gotta try this because I smell something true.
Ellen Page?
To be honest, it probably wasn't on by default. I followed so damned many different suggestions from so many sources that I'm pretty sure I've turned every possible switch on and off by now.
Lovely, isn't it? Us breeding these animals so they can have a turn at being alive.  These aren't animals kidnapped from the wild. They wouldn't have had a better life if it wasn't for this testing - they wouldn't have had *any* life.  &gt; Ironic isn't it?   Only if you are Alanis Morissette.   Chinchillas are not sentient. They are biological automata.  Edit: Cute automata though!
And technically people that watched at the arena and just used the neilsen diary would be counted.
It's a lot easier to eat and digest warm food. If we had big Neanderthal jaws it might not be such an issue.
Come to Toronto! I live downtown and will buy you a beer. I'll also hire you if you're especially awesome, but no guarantees.
*catered* sex!
In the news, whenever some junkie kid dies the news always praises how he was a good child and a good student and whatnot. If he/she was they wouldn't be at some derelict warehouse at 3 in the morning doing the wrong thing.  Hypothetical, but you know what I mean.
How DEA goes after doctors and makes them scared to give out strong narcotics.
Ive got a bottle of 120 in my closet. Any suggestions for how long to age it?
Depends. I would live in flip-flops given the option. But I live in a place with severe winters which means even inside the floors are cold for half the year. In a warm climate, yes, in a cold climate, pass the slippers and/or boots.
God damn that's clever.
At those kinds of transfer speeds (1638 petabytes a second), it really should measure the total downloaded section in 'internets'.
There were no dead men and marching army men when I was a kid.  One of my favs was the the army guy crawling flat on the ground with a rifle in his hand. And the bazooka man.
Nope, guess we just sit and hope.
Disagree if you want, but if John McCain had picked basically anyone else, he would have had at least a fighting chance of winning the election. Seriously, he could have just opened the phone book and pointed at the first name and it would have been better than Sarah Palin.
So you're pretty screwed if its a nuke? 
but that requires work, pdub wants free money
I just wish more companies would get bonuses to engineers/people involved based on performance. I'd work alot harder at my job if there was some profit-sharing!
Down voted for fantastic photos?
You gonna pay for my plane ticket? I'm sure as hell not walking all the way from Canada.
You should use Woodys. 
Why do they assume the Somali know English?   "SHOW YOUR HANDS!!"
From the youtube comments:  &gt;I won't go into detail. I'll just say this: I didn't have any fuckin' parents growing up. Oh, they were "there" but I'd have been better off if they weren't. All I had to keep from going nuts was TV. Among the things that﻿ eased my souls was Mr. Rogers neighborhood. I learned a lot of good things from him. Things I wasn't getting from my parents. He was part of what got me through the madness. Thank you Mr. Rogers. Thank you for caring about children. Thank you for being a good man. Thank you. 
They're recessive genes, so the expression can be reduced even if there are the same number of copies of the genes out there. It's true that the genes won't disappear though, bad wording on my part.
hot ham burg sandwiches boys!!
I stopped considering Texas a state a long time ago.
Norwegian here.  People who leave their shoes on when they come into my house get a good stern look of disapproval. 
Eets naht loopahs! (co starring Hugh Laurie?)
So I downloaded the torrent separately, opened the file in MTX, it transfered it all to the temp directory, I click install and...it's redownloading the whole damn thing. Am I doing something wrong or is this MTX program just a bigger pile of shit than I possibly imagined?
Oh-- I gotcha.  So it is typically understood in contemporary anthro/sociology to distinguish among the categories of race, ethnicity, nationality, etc.   Ethnicity is usually understood has one's current or ancestral heritage. So, I am Chinese and Italian. These words reference specific cultures and locations.   Nationality typically refers to the place you were born. So, for me. US American.   Race... yeah it is tricky to summarize because the meaning of it is rather fluid. Obviously you know the terms white, black, brown, and so on... these are races. When used very generally-- Latino or Asian can be used as races as well but this is only in general terms. They are non-specific to country or culture. They more or less are meant to describe a group of people based on certain (emphasis on certain because we could choose to group people by many different factors... skin color is the most common) physical characteristics who may or may not be of the same ethnicity or nationality. So... I consider myself to be half white but the white part of me doesn't reference what white might mean to you.   Similarly the distinction is made between sex and gender. I think this distinction is analogous to race and ethnicity. Sex-- biologically determined and referencing. Gender--social construction of what it means to be a man or a woman. Again... what it means to be a woman and a man (but really more woman) is in constant social shift. Think of the change in what has been considered "acceptable behavior" for women... ever-changing. 
wang-banger speaks the truth, people.
yes!
1984. I Am Legend. Journey to the Cetnre of the Earth and Around the World in 80 days. Hooray for Jules Verne.
I already got it! I am still too new. I don't know how you like to divide yourselves up yet. 
&gt;&gt;Hiring a videographer to shoot a low-budget commercial is usually a lot cheaper than actually paying for airtime, especially for a minute-plus commercial.  No, it's not.  You sir, are talking out of your ass.
All religions suck. That is all.
Here's mine: https://www.dropbox.com/referrals/NTExOTY1Mjk
sweet. totally totally sweet.
Just be careful with a technique like that... don't get your wires crossed.
Haha, if you had a Waffles invite that'd be awesome... and trust me when I say you don't want to see any poetry from me... then you really wouldn't want to send me an invite
I finished. I actually liked it, a lot, even though I had to struggle to get through a few of them. 'Guts' was the worst of them, imo. That is still probably the most unsettling bit of fiction I've ever read.
You do realize that there are breed rescues right? 
Hmm, Paranoia Agent, FLCL, Neon Genesis Evangelion, Serial Experiments Lain and Elfen Lied...  There were no survivors.
Damn. Nice catch.
it's just an elongated a I'd guess, sort of v-aa(r)-s. Sure does sound like "bars" though.  I'm in northern England, on the border between West and South Yorkshire. 
You could be right, I didn't pick that up.
the drug war....maybe even nixon in general.....maybe we can save some good old tax dollars from throwing harmless pot heads in jail, push it towards something more productive like school.
I don't know much at all about cars, so I wouldn't even know where to look on checking those fluid levels.  Pumping the clutch does not work at all for the reverse. It seems to for second, but it could just be the fact that the rpm's are dropping. 
nice! it's a great facility and it holds a very special place in my heart, especially since they stopped hosting ODS groups some time ago.
Almost. It smells like popcorn than anything else, and tastes like popcorn too. The vapor is ridiculously smooth, far smoother than a percolated bong or anything, and it feels much like breathing. No coughing, and no tar.
fair enough. i haven't seen it before though - does that make me an arse? don't understand the 'fuck you for reposting' thing...especially with this search engine - if you've seen it, just move on, it'll take care of itself.  that guy is a cunt.......just read his comments....i hope you're well.
True, that's a loop, too.  So, where *did* that compass come from?
plot sounds like ass
&lt;obligatory myopic and cynically trendy comment about how reddit is *already* devoid of interesting or insightful content. I am purposefully omitting reason as to why I'm still using the site&gt;
Les Stroud is a gigantic pussy who is followed by a camera crew everywhere. Whoever that guy from Survivor Man is is the *real* badass.
I don't think it works that way. Just get it waxed professionally once. See how it goes.
RRRAAAAWWWRRR!!!
So what were you SUPPOSED to be doing when you learned this?
Probably part of the stimulus package to prop up ford.
The man knows a lot about cameras...
Sorry, I prefer the original.  HDR is ok if not overblown, which I think yours are personally.  The digital camera sensor has it's limitations when it comes to dynamic range, I use HDR to try and get as close as possible to what the eye sees, the eye has a much higher dynamic range.  Someone gave me a good tip, they said take the HDR version of the photo and add it as a layer on top of the original in photoshop and lower the HDR layer opacity to roughy 50%, I use 45&amp; in the example below.  The HDR image is the top one in case you didn't notice and the bottom one is the original photograph. You will notice subtle differences between the 2, particularly the refection and the saturation.  The number one rule of HDR is don't overdo it.  However rules are made to be broken! ;-)  http://imgur.com/R1nqo
By random happenstance, I worked at an office in DC that had Coffee Crisp in the vending machine for about 2 weeks.  I'd clear that fucker out every time it was restocked.  Other than that, I haven't seen it in over two decades.
Not anymore, now he is spotted along the coastlines and swamplands of the Mississippi Delta :)
Yeah. If it helps, it was non-functional before I did the teardown.
It's Venice, Italy.  I highly recommend it.
I agree with everything in this post except for where you said: &gt;Any natural explanation, no matter how improbable, is still infinitely more probable than the magic sky fairy did it. I mean, even if you don't feel there is enough evidence to believe in God, I think you would be hard pressed to come up with some fact-based way to calculate the probability of God existing.  Without being able to calculate that probability, I don't know how you can make any reasonable comparisons as to how likely it is relative to other events that we also don't know the probability of.   
I just hope one of them tells another one to talk to the hand at some point, and makes that stupid animation face.
Your on a boat!  Seriously though, I'm with you. I believe a timeshare style option was discussed earlier with something like $1,000 being a price to aim for. Could somebody elaborate on this?
You deserve a reddit star:  *
That's about the only thing that can kill you, since it can kill you in one hit. Anything else you can just pause--&gt;stimpak as needed.
Take the subway to Ebisu and go to a basement blow-job bar: pay $70 and all you can drink, sit on a bench and every 15 minutes a girl will come and blow you. Stay as long as you want....
where exactly do you keep your money that it accrues interest these days?
Even if you're confused right now, feel free to let it out. What happened, and how are you feeling right now?
Yes, they should. But that doesn't mean they should be given cigarettes or any opportunities to obtain them.
No, you're making us look less militant. You aren't allowed to be tolerant!  Seriously though, mocking peoples' beliefs for me is just exercising my right to free speech and showing that nothing is sacred. In the words of one of the bishops here when they wanted to put atheist slogans on buses (which was overturned because the bus company caved to demands), it encourages discussion about what people believe. Daniel Dennett takes this sort of approach (albeit much more respectfully) in Breaking The Spell, saying that if things are too sacred to be questioned, then they can't be discussed, and that's unhealthy.  tl;dr mocking religions encourages religious people to mock atheism and take themselves less seriously overall
I fear this. 
Shit, I need a house so I can sell it.
I would, were it available in my country.
There are a few cases where asking my to make a random guess works splendidly, and others where I am not right at all.
motors and gyroscopes...
Meh... his stuff was a lot better before he went through rehab.
Where's the next place you're going to be eating? When will that be? Can you put me in your will?
I guess i just need to let it out and get some advice on how to move on. I know I have to and I really want to but for some reason I can't. 
Joe?
Hmm..I guess I don't really understand what you mean. Frankly, I consider myself to be normal and these guys to be mainly hipsters and/or drug dealers (two that live across the hall from me actually are), but they're douche drug dealers, not cool ones. So I feel like it's more about me feeling superior to them than anything else :P
Na the orange ones are good. Although they're pretty much just a rip of Jaffas. But you get less shell to chocolate ratio then with jaffas which makes them even more delicious.
Afghanistan?
What about women?
To avoid cars ramming, the 'safe spot' is where you go to get away from stupid drivers that might hit you ('defensive driving'). And... get a license?
Sorry dude, but she's not making that kind of scratch teaching English.
Boy, he's good.
&gt;What if he ran a child over? Why does bad behavior have to randomly hurt someone before you care?  He would still have diplomatic immunity and the consulate would still be on what amounts to Chinese soil.  In this case it would be the US using US law to deal with someone (using your example of a child being hit by a car) in Saudi Arabia the Saudis could use the same reasoning to detain US consular staff for breaching local laws that seem far less sensible...  The reason for diplomatic immunity and the status given to consulates and embassies is to ensure that you don't have tit for tat harassment of diplomats and so that countries can communicate sensibly with one another, it isn't about US law or what is right given a certain act, it is the principle of the thing.  In this case the police officers involved should have known better and were utterly in the wrong.  &gt;Fleeing the cops is fleeing the cops.  Diplomatic immunity is diplomatic immunity and US law doesn't apply to Chinese soil, whether in China or within the borders of the US.
Never had this problem. Have it installed on 3 different Win7 x64 boxes and the WoW downloaders work fine, and I'm double-NATed here at home to boot.
They will go perfect with my model sized Chinchilla Catholic Church!!!!
I sat down to play Final Fantasy 3 (the one with Terra and Locke etc., I can't remember the Japanese name but come on, you all know which one I'm talking about) and got up to the point where Terra and Locke flee Marshe.  I looked on GameFAQ's to make sure that there wasn't anything that I missed.  I saw that three of the chests I opened should be left closed so that you can get better items later.  Then I shut the game off and went outside.  (Since this is Reddit and you're all going to call me out anyway - I shut the game off and furiously masturbated.)
Oldie but a goodie.
Wal Marts are a good choice to park, my dad lived in the parking lot of one for a few years. You wouldn't know it but they are safe because they have CCTV cameras, some kids tried to mug my dad and it was all caught on film and they were all arrested.  On the note of the whore's shower, don't do that more than twice in a row without a real shower in between because the bacteria will become immune to the alcohol and it won't work as well anymore.  Edit into the post what area of which country you are in, perhaps a nearby kind redditor will be able to lend some help! a load of laundry, a shower, a snack perhaps?
Thanks to the interwebs, stickers and friends can all be bought with money! 
I noticed the handle of the poster is "retardo", pretty fitting for a Flash developer.   It is funny to see all these idiots reacting this way when called to task for all the crap they have been responsible for on the Internet.   It is not surprising they are looking for work.   
This. I was convinced there was some strange filesystem requirement until I did this, and I'm amazed it's not the default behavior when you put in a flash drive.
Am I the only one who thinks that she looks gawd awful?  Like, Holocaust-survivor awful?
Don't the "realdoll"s have vaginas? I see no split in the middle there....hmmm, beautiful and intriguing as erotic art I must admit.
I can do this too, just a little busy right now.
Sure it is. We cant ban gays, but we can ban ass-less chaps. We cant ban Muslims, but we can ban the burqua
Widest smile I've ever cum across.
Come on are you serious?  
Pretty sure Kimchi is the most disgusting food I've ever eaten. The texture and flavor reminds me of chewing on a spicy rubber band. Bleh.
Face/Off was a bad ass movie.
Whatever. Even if it was a serious Charlie Rose style interview about the industry in general, it would still be amazing.
Not until someone lets the cat out of the bag.
[Patrick Wolf](http://fashfash.files.wordpress.com/2009/02/patrick-wolf-018978.jpg) is bad-ass in his own, fabulous way. Always. I couldn't pick [just one](http://fashfash.wordpress.com/2009/02/15/patrick-wolf/).
I considered following the advice in the link but the troll face in this post deters me...
Sound quality, though?
"Dude, liver spots! High five!"
I would take a different stance:  Flash isn't inherently flawed, it's the incapable developers of flash apps.
I agree that the tradition is unfortunate, but this "solution" to it is worse.  Using the full force of the law to regulate things as innocuous as clothing, simply due to a style's social connotations, is a vastly worse situation than having some parents teach their children unfortunate superstitions.  If you wish to counter narrow-minded oppression, you cannot do it by instituting similar measures of oppression.  Social oppression is countered by free exchange of ideas, without fear of legal retribution for simply thinking, speaking, or dressing differently.
As did BushCo., via Karl Rove's GWB43.com. They spent government time and money plotting their political machinations on a private server, thereby dodging the requirements of the Presidential Records Act.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bush_White_House_e-mail_controversy  Fun fact:  In 2009, it was announced that as many as 22 million emails may have been deleted.
He should use these to go bowling
The thing that angers me the most is that this cunt and her trailer trash family are still in the news at all.
Also, rage? More like SSSSSSSOOOOOOOOOOOOOBBBB
Oh at first I thought you were just calling me ignorant, not the thread overall, lol.  Anyways, yeah, I've tried multiple computers and such, and reinstalling. I've just had shitty luck with it overall, so it just doesn't seem worth my time, I mean, what I'm saying is it's not the only video format out there, so I can just avoid it. The main purpose of this was to see if I was the only one having trouble with it or not.
Sweet Onion. Find me a supermarket substitute and I'll be morbidly obese in a matter of days.
Yeah, sorry, forgot.  It doesn't bother me much, so I sometimes forget.
He's an interesting character. All his stories (well almost) are set in the past. And his death has already been written. People just go back and give him more stuff to do prior to dying.  Jimmy Palmiotti has been doing a Jonah Hex series for a few years that's well received. Most of the stories are one-and-done and the few that aren't are two-three issues.  I read one of the trade paperbacks.  It was good but I think most of the fuss is like, "Holy shit, someone isn't dragging comic stories over six issues just for purposes of TPB reprinting."
God and the devil have been in merger talks lately. They have lots of overlapping departments. With declining membership it seems like the sensible thing to do to stay competitive.
Two things make an advertisement worth showing/viewing.  1. Introduction of a new product or improved product.  2. Announcement of a sale or promotion  unfortunately, most ads these days are all about brand recognition. You don't need to know what they are selling or for how much.. They just want to plant the image/idea of that company/logo/URL in your mind.
Whats strange is when the monumental task is actually on the computer (programming work, school paper, graphic design, etc) you will turn to your bed.
"My desk is always - gotta run, late for the show"   - Abraham Lincoln
Thank you! :D I'm thinking about transferring over sometime next year, it would be awesome if I already knew someone that goes there so I don't have to be all scared the first day.
No. They're (or were) gross. I had no idea that they weren't in production anymore.
I meant that most people I know speak without an inflection that differs from how, let's say, an American English dictionary would say to pronounce it. But I see your point. Fine, I guess I have a "California" accent.
&gt;People will be forced to use less oil. People will be forced to find homes closer to work (or work to home). But you know what? It will dramatically increase the cost of processed food while simultaneously not having much of an effect on local produce. Anytime there is more demand (as there would be for local produce if imports and processed foods cost more - everyone wants a good deal and a fair price) prices go up. On this point you are wrong.
Except by Chris Rock. Years ago. Onstage.
On the topic of 2: Or better yet, an option for jump bridges to be setup so that anyone can put Ozone into them without seeing the amount that is already in there. I can't see any drawbacks of this. The people putting stuff in wouldn't be able to see how much is in there (Without putting ozone in and reaching the capacity of the can, thus eliminating any tactical advantage of knowing that the can was empty in the first place) and I can't see how any alliance would want to restrict this.
1:47 GO!
I just killed an hour and a half of my life watching Kevin Smith. the guy is hilarious. LOVE the prince stuff. 
I'm from Dallas but I'm going to school in Lubbock, Tx.  My GF is from Lake Travis.
or you can let children decide when they feel like confronting their sexuality on their own time.
I hate when that happens.
Or if that gets boring, but you don't want to be too challenged, try "operation cwal" and "show me the money".
You don't need the retail discs, just the CD key.
But if they ruin it...Life would be so much less awesome. 
Fart VII: Electric Fartaloo
jesus won't save you from that animal.
I'm pro any life-change. Grab a bag and go somewhere. 
It's way too soon for this. If it is in fact an official video.   This seems like the kind of thing that could jinx a team.
&gt;trying an awesome beer that isn't distributed to my area is always a bit bittersweet. To me it the same kind of bittersweet joy that comes from buying a one-off or limited-time-only beer, sampling something similar at a beer event, or encountering something unique while traveling. When you know that no matter how much you like it, you are probably not gonna get another chance to drink it, so enjoy it now! When i lived out East I was not into Brooklyn's beers because the first ones I was introduced to were very underwhelming (lager, pilsner, Pennant '55 ale, brown ale).  But I sampled some of their Local #1 at a festival and I immediately threw aside my premature judgment of their beers.  I really liked the Local #1 and was curious to try a few of their others, but I could only get the basic lineup in Florida.   I had the same problem with Bell's.  The only beers of theirs that were available were not very impressive (Oberon was the only one that interested me at all and it isn't even that good).  I couldn't get any of their highly acclaimed brews like Two-hearted.  I can't wait for that collabo between HOTD and Deschutes.  Those are two of my favorites right there.  I just wish HOTD weren't so damn expensive.  I balked at paying $6/12oz bottle for Fred the other day.  That just hurts my wallet too much.
Are you nuts? Maybe "If a rockabilly was a car", or a even a greaser. Hipster? Nah.
Sorry I'm getting back to you so late, I went to bed. You may want to ask the doc that gave them to you if you should finish them if there were days in between them.
Bring band-aids.
Oh I see, I was lost for a minute. 
Another "great charter" written by a great man (one of many).  %-)
Imbecile.
&gt;Look at her mom.  Indeed. I wonder if women know that whether or not their mom is hot factors in as a consideration as to whether the relationship has marriage potential.  To any women reading: Please disregard what I just typed, nothing to see here, move along.
It was actually very good, saw it on tv.
Where are the laser sharks? You forgot the laser sharks. 
As a man, I've tried this before. It's wonderful. Would love to try it again. Hard to come by though. You can't just go around asking...
yeah.. it doesn't help that doocy is randomly standing in front of a weather radar screen at one point.. which has nothing to do with mr. rogers
And Haliburton was involved.  Color me shocked.
battle royale  EDIT: this deserves to be downvoted, but I couldn't help myself.
That's actually an error. A final period can be part of a URL, it's just usually omitted. The version with the trailing . should go to exactly the same place as the one without.
I used to wish it was real ;)
I say “veɪs” (like *face*), but I’ve also heard it pronounced “veɪz” (like *phase*) in addition to “vɑz” (like *pause*).
i wanted ot downvote this, for not being about tragic oil, but it is the greatest hypnotism. 
Ottawa really isn't Canada's Silicon Valley. That honour goes to Markham.
Nice! Curious about the body resonance.... how's the tone?
seriously, i just spent my entire evening reading this! Fantastic!
So maybe he made a thread about her on a forum and the thread was getting a lot of hits similar to the amount of people watching iron man 2?
What is the second track on this mix?!?
I have a friend who did pharmaceutical research on animals (ferrets). They would always kill all of the ferrets at the end of the trials, even ferrets that weren't directly used as part of the experiment. The FDA actually mandates this. Also, the FDA requires animals trials in the US for new drugs. Many countries in Europe do not.   If people have a problem with the way animals are used in certain experiments, they should lobby the government to allow non-animal trials for drugs.
Exactly. She's what the idea of normal USED to be, before all of this extreme bullshit went on. She's actually kind of hot.. you know what BRB..
The first time i saw this was on shrooms. FUNNIEST things of my life. i kid you not
For those opposing this, please refer to luuletaja's post [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/redditisland/comments/by386/how_things_have_developed/c0p66qe).  This is still pending group approval.
Guess what, I'm a girl (gay) and I think quite a few of the girls there are gorgeous. A few of them look too young for my taste, but the majority of them are sexually mature young women. Does that make me an ephebophile? Probably, but I don't care. Some of those girls are sexy, so I'll look. Also, it bothers me that you said "creepy men". I think that it is likely that 99% of men would be interested in looking at them. It's not one of the most popular subreddits for no reason, you know.
Why do we even have that door!?
Have you ever seen some of the stuff in the 3d warehouse? That's really awesome stuff there.  http://sketchup.google.com/3dwarehouse/details?mid=12bd585d23b1749d698e6a4aa39d2aea&amp;prevstart=0
If you're in Ginza, definitely get up early one morning and eat at Tsukiji market. Best sushi in the world, hands down, and not mega expensive too. You have to get up really early (or go there late after a night out partying) though, and the queues are often very long. Worth it though.
It's megamaid.  She's gone from suck to blow!
That is why the ppl. think so badly of the police.
